

Engaged Capital  I  Philosophy









 














We view ourselves as stewards of shareholder’s
            capital and believe by working constructively with company management
            and the Board we become a catalyst for positive change.


 In public
                companies, the shareholder’s
            voice gets diluted due to distributed ownership and frequent shareholder
            turnover
As a result it is common for management
                and Boards to begin placing the “interests of the company” (growth
              imperative) before the interests of the owners (return on investment)
Owners
                often want to participate in the decision making process but
                don’t have a vehicle to do so. Engaged Capital becomes
              the voice for the shareholders.
We bring an owner’s point
                of view to the governance and decision making process in a helpful,
                constructive way through a combination
              of:
Concentrated ownership (positions ranging
                from 1%-9.9% of portfolio companies)
 A long-term perspective (2-5
              year holding periods)
Deep research and value-added insights for
                increasing the company's worth

























Engaged Capital  I  Professionals








 
















Glenn W. Welling
Principal
        Chief Investment Officer
glenn@engagedcapital.com 
        Mr. Welling is the founder and Chief Investment Officer of Engaged Capital. He is responsible for overseeing all facets of the firm. Prior to Engaged Capital, Mr. Welling was a Principal and Managing Director at Relational Investors, a $6 billion activist equity fund. At Relational, Mr. Welling was responsible for managing the equity fund’s consumer, healthcare and utility group. He was involved in all aspects of Relational’s research process from the identification of investment ideas to the development and implementation of the engagement process with portfolio companies.
 Prior to Relational Investors, Mr. Welling spent seven years as a Managing Director at Credit Suisse as the Head of the Investment Banking Department’s Advisory Business. At Credit Suisse, he built his group from two to fifty people and into one of the leading commercially focused advisory businesses on Wall Street advising on over $100 billion of transactions in his last year there. Mr. Welling joined Credit Suisse when the Firm acquired HOLT Value Associates L.P. (“HOLT”) where he was a Partner and Managing Director. At HOLT, he ran the Corporate and Alliance Services business, advising senior executives and Boards on how their decisions would be viewed and valued by institutional investors. Prior to HOLT, he was the Managing Director of Valuad U.S., a financial software and training company. Prior to leading Valuad U.S., Mr. Welling worked at a number of leading strategy consulting firms including A.T. Kearney and Marakon Associates. He has worked and managed businesses in the United States, Europe, and Asia. 
Mr. Welling is a member of the Board of Directors of Jamba, Inc., a NASDAQ listed leading restaurant retailer of better-for-you food and beverage offerings , ROVI Corporation, a NASDAQ listed provider of digital entertainment technology solutions, and Medifast, Inc., a NYSE listed manufacturer of medically based, proprietary healthy living and meal replacement products. He also teaches executive education courses at the Wharton School of Business at the University of Pennsylvania, his alma mater, where he was a two year captain and four year letterman on the tennis team. He currently serves as Chairman of the Board of Directors for the university’s tennis program and as a member of the Wharton Executive Education Board.





 

David Demarest
Chief Operating Officer
david@engagedcapital.com

                    Mr. Demarest serves as the Chief Financial Officer, Chief Operating Officer and Chief Compliance Officer at Engaged Capital.  Mr. Demarest is responsible for all middle and back office operations at Engaged Capital. He has worked in the investment management industry for over 22 years, and has extensive experience across finance, operations and compliance.  Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Demarest spent 10 years as the Chief Administrative Officer at Relational Investors LLC, a $6 billion activist equity fund. Before Relational, he served as Chief Financial Officer of $2.5 Billion AUM Freeman Associates Investment Management, a quantitative investment advisor, and Chief Financial Officer of online investment advisor mPower.com. Before that he was Chief Operating Officer at Montgomery Asset Management, a multi-line investment advisor with $10 Billion under management. Mr. Demarest has also managed the mutual fund operations for the Copeland Companies, and for Wells Fargo Bank, NA. He began his career as an auditor at KPMG in New York City, where he was also licensed as a Certified Public Accountant. Mr. Demarest earned a Bachelor of Business Administration in Accounting from the Bradley University and a Masters in Business Administration from New York University.





 

        Christopher B. Hetrick, CFA
Director 
        Research
chris@engagedcapital.com
        Mr. Hetrick is the Director of Research at Engaged Capital.  His responsibilities include managing the research process from idea generation through to portfolio company communication as well as developing and overseeing the analyst team. 

        Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Hetrick spent over ten years with Relational Investors, a $6 billion activist equity fund which he joined following completion of his undergraduate studies. Mr. Hetrick began his career with Relational as an associate analyst when the firm had roughly $800 million in assets under management. He eventually became the firm’s senior consumer analyst overseeing over $1 billion in consumer sector investments. Prior to his work heading up the consumer research team, Mr. Hetrick was a generalist covering major investments in the technology, financial, automotive and food sectors. 

        Mr. Hetrick is a member of the Board of Directors of Rent-A-Center, Inc., a NASDAQ listed furniture and electronic rent-to-own company. Mr. Hetrick graduated summa cum laude with degrees in Economics and Finance from Pepperdine University in Malibu, CA. He is also a CFA charterholder.





 

        Richard T. Gray
Chief Client Officer
rich@engagedcapital.com
        Mr. Gray is Chief Client Officer at Engaged Capital. His responsibilities include managing client relationships and new business development for the Firm.

        Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Gray served two years as a Managing Director with J.P. Morgan Asset Management and was responsible for new business development in their global alternative investments business.  Previously, Mr. Gray spent eight years with the alternative investment firm, Ramius LLC, as a Managing Director responsible for new business and product development where he was a senior member of the team and led business development efforts for Starboard Value.  Before his role at Ramius, Mr. Gray held senior sales management positions with institutional asset managers John A. Levin and Co., Goldman Sachs & Co., United Asset Management and Dreyfus Corporation.

        Mr. Gray graduated with a B.B.A. in Investments, Banking & Finance from Hofstra University.





 

Greg Paulsen, CFA
Director
        Risk Management & Trading
greg@engagedcapital.com
        Mr. Paulsen serves as the Director of Risk Management & Trading at Engaged Capital where he is responsible for the firm’s hedging strategy, portfolio analytics, and trading.

        Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Paulsen served as a Product Specialist at Relational Investors where he worked alongside the research staff and was responsible for the firm’s portfolio analytics as well as product development. Before joining Relational Investors, Mr. Paulsen was an Assistant Portfolio Manager at Freeman Associates Investment Management where he helped manage several long-short and long only equity strategies. Prior to Freeman, Mr. Paulsen was an Assistant Portfolio Manager at Barclays Global Investors Alpha Strategies Group, where he was accountable for implementing quantitative equity strategies. He started his career as an Analyst with Barra, a provider of risk management tools and analytics for institutional investors. 

        Mr. Paulsen earned a Bachelor’s degree in Economics with a concentration in Finance from California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo and is a CFA Charterholder.





 

Brendan Springstubb,
                    CFA
                  Senior Analyst
brendan@engagedcapital.com
  Mr. Springstubb is a Senior Analyst at Engaged Capital. His responsibilities include idea generation, fundamental research, engagement strategy, and portfolio company communications.
 Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Springstubb spent nearly eight years at Relational Investors, a $6B activist equity fund. At Relational, Mr. Springstubb was most recently the senior analyst covering the healthcare sector where was responsible for identifying and overseeing activist investment opportunities, communicating with portfolio company management teams, and managing a team of two associate analysts. Prior to leading the healthcare group, Mr. Springstubb was a generalist covering investments in the telecom, financial, and technology sectors.   
Mr. Springstubb is a member of the Board of Directors of SunOpta, Inc., a NASDAQ listed global company focused on organic, non-genetically modified and specialty food products. He earned a Master’s degree in Biotechnology with a dual concentration in Biotechnology Enterprise and Regulatory Affairs from the Johns Hopkins University and a Bachelor’s degree in Economics and Molecular Biology from Pomona College. Mr. Springstubb is also a CFA Charterholder and a Certified Financial Risk Manager




 
 
Blake Zacharias
Senior Analyst
blake@engagedcapital.com
          Mr. Zacharias is  a Senior Analyst at Engaged Capital. Prior to joining Engaged
          Capital, Mr. Zacharias spent four years at Relational Investors, a $6
          billion activist equity fund in San Diego. At Relational, Mr. Zacharias
          served as the primary Analyst covering the Industrials and Materials
          sectors. He assisted the Managing Directors in selecting new investments,
          interacting with portfolio company management teams, and catalyzing strategic
          changes at portfolio companies. 

          Prior to his promotion to Analyst, Mr. Zacharias served as an Associate
          Analyst at Relational Investors and worked on investments in the industrial,
          materials, and financial sectors. Mr. Zacharias joined Relational immediately
          after graduating from Claremont McKenna College, where he graduated Magna
          Cum Laude with degrees in Economics and Mathematics.  




 

William Kafoure
Analyst
will@engagedcapital.com
        Mr. Kafoure is an Analyst at Engaged Capital, working on investments in the consumer and technology sectors. Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Mr. Kafoure was an Analyst at NERA Economic Consulting in San Francisco, where he worked on projects for Fortune 500 technology and energy clients.  
Mr. Kafoure holds a master’s degree in Financial Economics from the University of Oxford, and a bachelor’s degree in International Affairs and Economics from George Washington University, where he graduated Phi Beta Kappa and Summa Cum Laude.





 

Andrew Jung
Controller
ajung@engagedcapital.com
              Mr. Jung serves as the Controller at Engaged Capital.  Mr. Jung is responsible for assisting the Chief Financial Officer with all fund accounting and audit related matters for the firm.  He has worked in the alternative investment industry for over eight years and has extensive experience across various areas of financial accounting and fund operations. 

              Prior to joining Engaged, Mr. Jung was an Operations Associate at Empyrean Capital, a corporate event-driven and relative value investment manager with AUM of $2.2 billion.  Before Empyrean Capital, he was an Accounting Manager at Oaktree Capital Management, an $83 billion private equity firm.  Mr. Jung began his career at Pacific Alternative Asset Management Company as a fund accountant. 

              Mr. Jung earned a Bachelor of Business Administration in Finance from the University of Southern California and is a Certified Public Accountant. 




 
Emily Marroquin
Investor Relations Associate
emarroquin@engagedcapital.com
              Ms. Marroquin is an Investor Relations Associate at Engaged Capital. She coordinates investor communications, facilitates preparation of investor materials, and assists in establishing and maintaining investor accounts. Prior to joining Engaged Capital, Ms. Marroquin was a Project Coordinator at Peregrine Realty Partners, a Southern California commercial real estate and investment advisory firm where she assisted in managing the daily operations of their Los Angeles portfolio. Ms. Marroquin earned a Bachelor of Science in Finance from the State University of New York at Oswego.
 



























Engaged Capital  I  Contact









 
































Engaged Capital  I  Login









 















Enter your login and password






Login:
Password:
 





























Engaged Capital  I  Home









 





























Engaged Capital  I  News













 













Press Releases 
July 27, 2017
 Engaged Capital Calls on Rent-A-Center CEO Mark Speese to Cease Mischaracterizations to Investors and Calls on Incumbent Directors to Act as Fiduciaries for Stockholders or Resign
July 25, 2017
 Engaged Capital Issues Statement in Respect of Rent-A-Center
June 8, 2017
 All Engaged Capital Nominees Resoundingly Elected to the Board of Rent-A-Center
June 5, 2017
 Engaged Capital Reminds Rent-A-Center Stockholders to Vote BLUE Proxy to Stop Further Value Destruction
June 1, 2017
 Glass Lewis Recommends Rent-A-Center Stockholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s BLUE Proxy
May 30, 2017
 ISS Recommends Rent-A-Center Stockholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s BLUE Proxy
May 22, 2017
 Engaged Capital Releases Second Presentation to Set the Record Straight for Rent-A-Center Stockholders
May 22, 2017
 Engaged Capital Releases Supplemental Presentation to Rent-A-Center Stockholders
May 18, 2017
 Engaged Capital Responds to Rent-A-Center’s Misleading Claims and Reminds Stockholders of the Need for Change
May 2, 2017
 Engaged Capital Releases Presentation to Rent-A-Center Stockholders
May 2, 2017
 Engaged Capital Presentation to Rent-A-Center Stockholders
April 25, 2017
 Engaged Capital Responds to Rent-A-Center Board’s Outrageous Justification for Abusing Stockholder Rights
April 25, 2017
 Engaged Capital Exposes Rent-A-Center Board’s Latest Attempt to Use Corporate Machinery as an Entrenchment Tactic
February 23, 2017
Engaged Capital Nominates Five Highly Qualified Candidates for Election to the Board of Rent-A-Center
February 14, 2017
Engaged Capital Calls on the Board of Rent-A-Center, Inc. to Immediately Begin a Strategic Alternatives Process
December 7, 2016
First Letter to Rent-A-Center Board of Directors
May 27, 2016
MagnaChip Reaches Settlement with Engaged Capital, LLC
May 11, 2016
Engaged Capital Nominees Elected to Benchmark Board
May 4, 2016
Benchmark Shareholders the Time for Action has Arrived; Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s BLUE Proxy to Elect all Three Engaged Nominees Today
May 2, 2016
Glass Lewis Joins ISS in Recommending Benchmark Shareholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s BLUE Proxy
April 27, 2016
ISS Recommends Benchmark Shareholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital's BLUE Proxy
April 26, 2016
Engaged Capital Reminds Benchmark Board That Numbers Don’t Lie
April 25, 2016
Engaged Capital Sets the Record Straight in a New Presentation to Benchmark Shareholders
April 21, 2016
Benchmark Electronics’ First Quarter Results Underscore the Need for Change
April 7, 2016
Engaged Capital Fact-checks Benchmark Electronics’ Letter to Shareholders
March 30, 2016
Engaged Capital Issues Open Letter To The Shareholders Of Benchmark Electronics
March 1, 2016
Engaged Capital Nominates Herbert K. Parker For Election To The Board Of Benchmark Electronics
March 1, 2016 
Engaged Capital Responds To Retirement Of Benchmark Electronics Chairman
February 26, 2016
Engaged Capital Nominates Four Highly-Qualified Individuals for Election to the Board of Benchmark Electronics
February 26, 2016
Engaged Capital Responds to Latest Entrenchment Attempt from Benchmark Electronics
February 18, 2016
Presentation: Creating Shareholder Value at Outerwall
February 18, 2016
Letter to Outerwall Board of Directors
February 18, 2016
Engaged capital sends letter to outerwall board outlining Immediate strategy for sustainable value creation
January 28, 2016
HeartWare International Announces Cooperation Agreement With Engaged Capital, LLC
January 28, 2016
HeartWare International And Valtech Cardio, Ltd. Announce Termination Of Proposed Acquisition
January 7, 2016
 Engaged Capital Reiterates Call for HeartWare International to Immediately Terminate Proposed Acquisition of Valtech Cardio
December 30, 2015
 Engaged Capital Nominates Three Highly-Qualified Individuals for Election to the Board of HeartWare International
September 24, 2015
 Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of AeroVironment, Inc.
June 29, 2015
 Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Board of AeroVironment, Inc.
May 13, 2015
 Engaged Capital Nominees Elected to Rovi Board
May 8, 2015
 Send a Message to the Rovi Board – Enough is Enough!
May 6, 2015
 Rovi Shareholders – It’s Time to Change the Channel Vote the WHITE Engaged Capital Proxy to Defend Shareholder Value
May 4, 2015
On the Heels of ISS and Glass Lewis’ Recommendation to Vote Engaged Capital’s White Proxy Card, Rovi Adopts Compensation Changes in Reactive and Overdue Reform
May 1, 2015
Medifast nominates final board members after activist investor shakeup
May 1, 2015
Glass Lewis Joins ISS in Recommending That Rovi Shareholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s WHITE Proxy
April1 28, 2015
ISS Recommends That Rovi Shareholders Vote for Change on Engaged Capital’s White Proxy
April1 6, 2015
Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Fellow Rovi Shareholders
April 6, 2015
Medifast, Inc. Announces Reconstitution Of Board Of Directors And Cooperation Agreement with Engaged Capital
March 26, 2015
Engaged Capital Files Preliminary Proxy Materials for the Election of Three
              Highly-Qualified Directors at the 2015 Annual Meeting of Rovi Corporation
March 12, 2015
Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Board of Rovi Corporation
February 25, 2015
TriMas Appoints Herbert K. Parker to Board of Directors
January 13, 2015
Jamba Agrees to Appoint Two New Independent Directors
December 22, 2014
Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Board of Silicon Image
September 29, 2014
Engaged Capital Sends Letter to Volcano Board of Directors
November 19, 2014
Under pressure from activists, Oplink sells itself to Koch for $445M (OPLK)
November 6, 2014
Oplink Shareholders for Change (OSC) Release Letter to Fellow Shareholders
September 23, 2014
Oplink Shareholders for Change (OSC) Files Preliminary Proxy Materials
April 30, 2014
Engaged Capital Settles Proxy Contest With Abercrombie & Fitch
            April 10, 2014
Rentech Announces $150 Million Investment from Blackstone and Settlement Agreement with Concerned Rentech Shareholders
March 20, 2014
Concerned Rentech Shareholders Solicits Consents to Call Special Meeting to Stop Rentech From Issuing Equity and Defying Shareholder Wishes
March 17, 2014
Concerned Rentech Shareholders Urges Rentech Board to Immediately Halt Capital Raising Plans and Promptly Hold 2014 Annual Meeting
February 20, 2014
Engaged Capital Nominates Five Highly Qualified Candidates for the Board of Abercrombie & Fitch
January 28, 2014
Engaged Capital Responds to Announcement from Abercrombie & Fitch Co.
January 13, 2014
Concerned Rentech Shareholders Seeks to Reconstitute Rentech’s Board
July 17, 2013
Engaged Capital Outlines Path to Achieve Fair Valuation at AeroVironment
May 30, 2013
Leading Activist Equity
              Investors Announce Global Tie-up
September 10, 2012
Engaged
              Capital LLC Announces Strategic Partnership with Grosvenor Capital
          Management.

 
 

Engaged Capital In The News
July 25, 2017
 NB Activist Restarts Battle  (Orange County Business Journal)
July 25, 2017
 Activist Is 'Outraged' that Rent-A-Center Rejected Multiple Bids  (The Street)
July 24, 2017
 UPDATE 1-Rent-A-Center shunned takeover interest from HIG, Lone Star-sources  (CNBC)
July 17, 2017
 How Index Funds Could Turbocharge Activism  (The Street)
July 12, 2017
 Rent-a-Center shares soar after rejecting takeover bid  (New York Post)
July 11, 2017
 Rent-A-Center Shares Surge on Takeover Bid  (CFO)
July 11, 2017
 Rent-A-Center Rejects Takeover Proposal; Stock Jumps  (The Wall Street Journal)
July 11, 2017
 Rent-A-Center Rejects $15-a-Share Vintage Offer Despite Activist's Recent Victory  (The Street)
July 6, 2017
 Amazon's Deal for Whole Foods Could Mean This Organic-Food Company Is Sold Next  (The Street)
June 30, 2017
 Hain Celestial a Star Stock Even Without a Takeover  (Barron's)
June 30, 2017
 Organic Foodmaker Hain Looks Appetizing  (Bloomberg)
June 30, 2017
 Activist Calls out Hain Celestial  (Barron's)
June 30, 2017
 Hain Celestial investor has 9.9% stake, seeks board seats  (Newsday)
June 29, 2017
 Activist Engaged Capital Moves to Overhaul Hain Celestial Board  (The Wall Street Journal)
June 20, 2017
 Hedgie slams Rent-A-Center’s board for taking two-month vacation  (New York Post)
June 8, 2017
 Here's Why an Activist Just Got a Boost in His Rent-A-Center Sale Effort  (The Street)
June 8, 2017
 Rent-A-Center Loses Three Board Seats to Activist Engaged  (Bloomberg)
June1, 2017
 Here's Why Activist Welling Just Got a Second Boost in his Rent-A-Center Sale Effort  (The Street)
May 30, 2017
 Here's Why Activist Glenn Welling Just Got a Boost in His Rent-A-Center Sale Effort  (The Street)
May 23, 2017
 Young Guns of Activism Join Boards at AIG, SunOpta and DepoMed  (The Street)
April 12, 2017
 Rent-A-Center shareholder challenges struggling Plano retailer to a proxy fight  (Dallas News)
April 10, 2017
 Marcato Joins Activist Push for Rent-A-Center Sale  (Bloomberg)
April 5, 2017
6 Stocks That Could Get a Bump From Glenn Welling  (The Street)
March 29, 2017
Rent-A-Center Adopts 'Poison Pill' Following Activist Campaign  (The Street)
February 24, 2017
Activist investor wants shakeup of Rent-A-Center board  (Dallas Business Journal)
February 23, 2017
Engaged Capital seeks Rent-A-Center board change in push for company's sale  (Reuters)
February 17, 2017
Engaged's Welling Escalates Rent-A-Center Campaign, Urges Sale  (The Street)
February 14, 2017
Activist Investor Calls for Rent-A-Center to Sell Itself  (The Wall Street Journal)
February 14, 2017
Rent-A-Center investor urging company to sell itself, citing 75 percent stock nosedive  (Dallas Business Journal)
February 14, 2017
Shareholder tells Rent-A-Center to put itself up for sale  (Dallas News)
January 30, 2017
Rent-A-Center Shares Spike on Glenn Welling's Campaign (The Street)
December 1, 2016
Ranking the Activists for Proxy Season 2016 (The Street)
October 7, 2016
SunOpta Gets Oaktree Investment, Board Seats Including Engaged (Bloomberg)
September 16, 2016
Engaged Capital’s performance aided by Rovi’s strong returns – Activist Profiler (Activistmonitor, the leading provider of predictive intelligence and behavioral data on shareholder activism for the global investment community.)
September 15, 2016
Investor pressure grows at SunOpta as third hedge fund reports stake (Reuters Canada)
September 15, 2016
SunOpta Targeted by Activist Engaged Capital With New Stake (Bloomberg)
July 25, 2016
Redbox Owner Outerwall to Be Acquired for About $900 Million (The New York Times)
July 25, 2016
Outerwall, owner of Redbox and Coinstar, going private in $1.6B deal (The Seattle Times)
July 25, 2016
Apollo Global affiliates to take Outerwall private in $1.6 billion deal (Reuters)
July 25, 2016
In Shock to Short-Sellers, Apollo Pays $1.6B for Outerwall (The Street)
June 27, 2016
Medtronic buys heart failure specialist HeartWare for $1.1 billion (Star Tribune)
June 27, 2016
Medtronic Acquires HeartWare With Some Activist Inspiration (The Street)
July 20, 2016
Engaged looks for a path to resolve a company’s valuation issues - Activist Profiler (Activistmonitor, the leading provider of predictive intelligence and behavioral data on shareholder activism for the global investment community.)
May 27, 2016
MagnaChip Settles With Activist in Deal That Could Lead to a Sale (The Street)
May 11, 2016
Benchmark Electronics’ Activist Engaged Wins Two Board Seats (Bloomberg)
May 11, 2016
Engaged Capital earns two seats on Benchmark's board (Reuters)
April 12, 2016
Outerwall agrees with activist investor to add 3 directors (Reuters)
April 12, 2016
Outerwall adds 3 members to board at urging of activist investor (The Seattle Times)
April 12, 2016
Redbox Parent Gives Board Seats To A Major Critic As It Weighs Options (Deadline)
April 12, 2016
Outerwall Adds Three Directors to Settle With Engaged Capital (Bloomberg)
April 12, 2016
What's Next for These 5 Companies Targeted by Activist Investor Glenn Welling? (The Street)
April 12, 2016
Redbox Owner Outerwall to Add Three to Board in Deal With Activist (The Walll Street Journal)
March 30, 2016
Benchmark Electronics pushes back against activist investors (Houston Chronicle)
March 14, 2016
Outerwall To Explore Strategic And Financial Alternatives To Maximize Shareholder Value (PR Newswire)
February 22, 2016
Activist Investor Urges Redbox Parent to Go Private (The Walll Street Journal)
February 18, 2016
Redbox Parent Outerwall Faces Increased Investor Pressure to Go Private (Variety)
February 8, 2016
Outerwall Said Targeted by Activist Welling's Engaged Capital (Bloomberg Business)
November 27, 2015
Small-Cap Activism Raging (Seeking Alpha)
November 25, 2015
Pinnacle to Buy Boulder for $710 Million to Add Natural Food (Bloomberg)
October 6, 2015
Engaged Capital Pressures HeartWare to Drop Valtech Deal (The Street)
October 5, 2015
A Comp Consultant and an Activist Debate Finer Points of Executive Pay (Repartee)
October 5, 2015
Engaged Capital Opposes HeartWare Deal for Valtech Cardio (The Wall Street Journal)
August 14, 2015
Small but dutiful: How to pursue change without filing (The Deal Pipeline)
August 6, 2015
Boulder Brands Receives Transaction Interest, Exploring Options (Bloomberg Business)
July 29, 2015
Boulder Brands Targeted by Activist Welling’s Engaged Capital (Bloomberg)
July 29, 2015
Activists pile into MagnaChip as chipmaker reviews strategic options (The Deal Pipeline)
July 29, 2015
Another Activist Enters The MagnaChip Semiconductor Corporation (MX) Fray (Insider Monkey)
July 29, 2015
Boulder Brands targeted by activist investor Engaged Capital (The Denver Post)
July 24, 2015
Ranking the activists for proxy season 2015 (The Deal)
July 24, 2015
Activists continue to squeeze value out of Jamba (The Deal)
June 18, 2015
Medifast CEO 'very pleased' after shareholders approve board overhaul (Baltimore Business Journal)
May 13, 2015
Rovi Activist Engaged Wins Two Board Seats, Ousts Chairman (Bloomberg)
May 4, 2015
Engaged's Welling gets second boost with Glass Lewis backing at Rovi (ROVI) (The Deal)
April 28, 2015
Engaged's Welling gets early lift with ISS backing at Rovi (The Deal)
April 6, 2015
Medifast to overhaul board of directors after activist shareholder pressure (The Baltimore Sun)
April 6, 2015
Medifast CEO: Activist Investor Glenn Welling Accelerated Board Changes (Baltimore Business Journal)
April 6, 2015
Medifast Adds Board Members in Agreement with Engaged Capital (The Wall Street Journal)
April 3, 2015
Jamba to Sell 100 Stores for $36 Million in Cash (The Wall Street Journal)
March 30, 2015
At Rovi, Activist Investor's Years of Protests Against Executive Pay May Give Leverage on Board (The Street)
March 12, 2015
Rovi Activist Engaged Declares Proxy Fight for Board Control (Bloomberg)
January 28, 2015
Engaged Capital Scores Quick Win with Silicon Image (The Wall Street Journal)
January 17, 2015
Lattice Semiconductor Shells Out $600 Million for Silicon Image (The Street)
January 13, 2015
What Will The New Jamba Juice Look Like? (Buzzfeed)
January 13, 2015
Jamba Juice Already Added Kale. Now It’s Adding Two Activists (Wall Street Journal)
December 22, 2014
Silicon Image targeted by activist investor Engaged Capital (Chicago Tribune)
September 23, 2014
Field Experience Helps Win Board Seats (Wall Street Journal)
August, 2014
High Impact Dialog – An Interview with Glenn Welling of Engaged Capital (Activist Monthly)
August 1, 2014
Oplink Strategic Review Fails to Satisfy Activists (The Street) 
July 29, 2014
Oplink to Explore Segment Sale Following Activist Pressure (Wall Street Journal)
July 24, 2014
Jamba Juice Gets Squeezed by Activist (Wall Street Journal)
July 15, 2014
Activists Join Fray at Oplink Communications (The Street)
July 14, 2014
Activists Urge Separation of Oplink's Connected Unit -- Update (Wall Street Journal)
June 18, 2014
The next generation of shareholder activists (IR Magazine)
May 14, 2014
Medifast Newest Target of Activist Investor Engaged Capital (Bloomberg)
March 12, 2014
The Deal’s guide to activists: A program for proxy season (The Deal)
February 25, 2014
Behind the Scenes of the Abercrombie Boardroom Battle (BuzzFeed Business) 
            February 10, 2014
Who’s Barking? (The Deal Pipeline) 
January 13, 2014
Terms of Engagement:  Activist Investor Prefers Low Profile But Will Take Fights Public (Orange County Business Journal) 
December 9, 2013
Abercrombie & Fitch
            Renews Contract With CEO (The Wall Street Journal)
December 3, 2013
Engaged Capital Tells Abercrombie: Replace
            CEO (The Wall Street Journal)
December 3, 2013
Activist Fund Seeks Change at the Top of Abercrombie (NY Times DealBook)
December 3, 2013
Abercrombie
            Advances After Call for New CEO, Possible Sale (Bloomberg)
December 3, 2013
Under the Threshold Activism Below 5% (The Activist Report – 13D Monitor)
December 3, 2013
Engaged Capital
              Sends Letter to Abercrombie & Fitch Board of Directors
November 30, 2013
How to Profit From Today's Shareholder Activism (Barron’s)
November 13, 2013
Volcano Corp. Seen
              Luring Abbott With Activist Push: Real M&A (Bloomberg)
November 12, 2013
Corporate Governance the Focus for a New Type of Activist Investor (Activist Insight – Josh
              Black)
November 6, 2013
Investor Activism Erupts At Volcano (Seeking Alpha)
November 6, 2013
Volcano Faces Activist Fire Over Missed Forecasts (The
              Wall Street Journal)
November 4, 2013
Engaged Capital Calls on Volcano to Consider $200 Million Buyback (The
              Wall Street Journal)
September 3, 2013
Engaged Lays out Plans for AeroVironment Campaign (Activist
              Insight – Josh Black)
July 24, 2013
The Deal Pipeline (Tatjana Kulkarni)
July 17, 2013
Activist investment firm buys 5.1% of drone maker AeroVironment (Los
              Angeles Times) 
July 17, 2013
Engaged Capital
            Takes Stake of About 5% in AeroVironment (The Wall Street Journal)
July 11, 2013
Young Guns of Activism - Engaged Capital (The Activist Report – 13D
              Monitor)
May 31, 2013
Two activist hedge fund firms join efforts and plan new strategy (Opalesque
              Ltd.)
May 30, 2013
Pension-backed
            Governance for Owners in activism partnership with ex-Relational
            MD (Responsible Investor) 
March 7, 2013
11th Annual Investment Strategies Conference. Hosted by Luther King
                Capital Management Center for 
              Financial Studies at the Neeley School
              of Business at TCU and the TCU Endowment Office 
              (Neeley School
            of Business) January 29, 2013
Glenn
              Welling speaker at 2013 Directors Forum. Forum brings together
              over thirty-five of the top corporate governance thought leaders
              in the U.S.  (Photos
              of Directors Forum)

              January, 18, 2013
Special Report:  Shareholder Activism Review 2012 (Activist Insight)
December 3, 2012
Studies reveal the value of activism; Data suggests that investors
                who actively engage with the 
              companies they own can outperform
              more hands-off rivals  (Financial News)

September 13, 2012
New Small-Cap Activist
            Wins Grosvenor Seed. (FINalternatives) 
September 12, 2012
Engaged
            Capital launches with $85M seed investment from Grosvenor Capital
            Management. (Opalesque)
September 12, 2012
Activist investment firm Engaged
            Capital launched this month. (Hedge Fund Net) 
 






















 



Engaged Capital Reiterates Call for HeartWare International to Immediately Terminate Proposed Acquisition of Valtech Cardio | Business Wire


























































Engaged Capital Reiterates Call for HeartWare International to 
      Immediately Terminate Proposed Acquisition of Valtech Cardio







        Management’s rationale for pursuing Valtech is flawed


        Management’s public forecast for Valtech is misleading


        HTWR’s VAD franchise is undervalued


        The milestone payment acceleration provision serves as a ten-year 
        poison pill


        The Valtech acquisition entrenches HTWR’s board and management 
        team at the expense of shareholders













Download



Full Size


Small


Preview


Thumbnail










HTWR's Revenue Projections for Valtech (Graphic: Business Wire)





January 07, 2016 08:00 AM Eastern Standard Time



NEWPORT BEACH, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Engaged Capital, LLC, an investment firm specializing in enhancing the 
      value of small and mid-cap North American equities, today sent a third 
      letter to the Board of Directors (the “Board”) of HeartWare 
      International, Inc. (“HTWR” or the “Company”) (NASDAQ:HTWR).
    

      The full text of the letter follows:
    

      January 7, 2016
    

      Board of DirectorsHeartWare International, Inc.500 Old 
      Connecticut PathFramingham, MA 01701Members of the Board:
    

      Engaged Capital, LLC (together with its affiliates, “Engaged Capital”) 
      remains the owner of approximately 1.3% of the outstanding common stock 
      of HeartWare International, Inc. (“HTWR” or the “Company”). We informed 
      you of our opposition to the proposed acquisition of Valtech Cardio, 
      Ltd. (“Valtech”) in our letter dated December 28, 2015. The HTWR Board 
      of Directors (the “Board”) has decided to ignore our valid position and 
      to move forward with a shareholder vote on the Valtech acquisition. As a 
      result, we are compelled to publicly detail the substantial concerns we 
      and other significant shareholders share regarding the Valtech 
      acquisition proposal, including:
    

1. The Rationale for Pursuing Valtech is Flawed


2. Management’s Investor Day Forecast for Valtech is Misleading


3. HTWR’s VAD Franchise is Undervalued


4. The Milestone Acceleration Provision Serves as a Ten-Year 
      Poison Pill


5. The Valtech Acquisition Entrenches the Board and Management 
      Team at the Expense of HTWR Shareholders


The Rationale for Pursuing Valtech is Flawed


      HTWR has focused on Cardioband as the key value-creating asset in the 
      Valtech portfolio that justifies the acquisition of Valtech – no 
      surprise given it is the only device within the Valtech portfolio 
      expected to generate any material revenue for the next five years. 
      Management has cited the performance of Abbott’s MitraClip and the 
      “conventional wisdom” that mitral valve repair is preferable to mitral 
      valve replacement in the treatment of mitral regurgitation as some of 
      the reasons to believe Cardioband will generate significant revenues for 
      HTWR. As we outline below, this thesis is based on tenuous assumptions 
      and ignores the significant clinical, competitive, and regulatory risks 
      facing the device.
    

      First, brand new clinical data calls into question the thesis that 
      transcatheter repair of mitral regurgitation (“MR”) will continue to be 
      preferred to transcatheter replacement. An article posted to the New 
      England Journal of Medicine website on November 9, 2015 contained 
      updated two year data from the Cardiothoracic Surgical Trials Network’s 
      study comparing mitral valve repair to mitral valve replacement in 
      patients with severe ischemic MR. Significantly, this is the only 
      randomized trial that compares the outcomes of mitral valve repair 
      vs. mitral valve replacement in patients with MR. The results of this 
      study are not supportive of a robust future for mitral valve repair. To 
      quote the authors (emphasis added):
    

      “The rate of recurrence of moderate or severe mitral regurgitation over 
      2 years was higher in the repair group than in the replacement 
      group (58.8% vs. 3.8%, P<0.001). There were no significant 
      between-group differences in rates of serious adverse events and overall 
      readmissions, but patients in the repair group had more serious 
      adverse events related to heart failure (P = 0.05) and 
      cardiovascular readmissions (P = 0.01). On the Minnesota Living with 
      Heart Failure questionnaire, there was a trend toward greater 
      improvement in the replacement group (P = 0.07) 1.”
    

      Digging further into the published data reveals that on nearly every 
      measure of cardiovascular adverse events, the replacement arm 
      outperformed the repair arm. Again, to quote the authors (emphasis 
      added):
    

      “…we observed that the recurrence of mitral regurgitation, which was 
      mostly moderate in degree, remained a progressive and excess hazard 
      for patients undergoing mitral-valve repair… This deficiency in 
      the durability of correction of mitral regurgitation is disconcerting, 
      given that recurrence confers a predisposition to heart failure, atrial 
      fibrillation, and repeat interventions and hospitalizations. We found 
      that patients in the repair group had more serious adverse events of 
      heart failure and hospital readmission for cardiovascular causes1.”
    

      Not only did patients in the replacement arm have less cardiovascular 
      adverse events, these patients also had a better quality of life than 
      patients in the repair arm:
    

      “The findings of the Minnesota Living with Heart Failure questionnaire, 
      although not conclusive, were consistent with these clinical events. The 
      7.9-point difference in average improvement over baseline in favor 
      of the replacement group was not significant (P = 0.07), but the 
      magnitude of change exceeded the 5-point threshold for clinically 
      meaningful improvement used in other studies1.”
    

      Historically, the preference for mitral valve repair over replacement 
      was driven by the presumption that while both were equally effective at 
      correcting MR, repair was the safer procedure. This landmark study – the 
      first of its kind – demonstrates that not only is the safety advantage 
      associated with repair statistically insignificant, repair is clearly 
      inferior to replacement in preventing the recurrence of MR and on 
      many clinical measures, the outcomes for patients receiving repair
were inferior at 2 years.
    

      What does this mean for transcatheter mitral valve repair devices like 
      Cardioband? As transcatheter mitral valve replacement devices are 
      developed and refined, it is quite likely any periprocedural safety 
      advantage associated with repair (both surgical and transcatheter) will 
      diminish and may eventually vanish entirely. As such, we find it hard 
      to believe Cardioband will achieve the robust revenues projected by HTWR 
      management if transcatheter repair offers little, if any, safety 
      advantage and is clearly inferior in durably correcting MR when compared 
      to replacement.
    

      Second, the path to U.S. approval for Cardioband is murky at best. HTWR 
      management has already begun walking back their initial expectations for 
      a late 2018 U.S. launch of Cardioband, recently saying that a 2019 
      launch “hopefully is not overly ambitious2”. 
      Given that management is still “brainstorming3” 
      potential trial designs and has not yet had any formal meetings with the 
      FDA, a 2019 approval certainly appears to be an optimistic outcome. We 
      need only look to Abbott’s MitraClip – the only transcatheter mitral 
      valve repair device with U.S. approval to date – to observe how long 
      (and risky) the path to U.S. approval will be for Cardioband. MitraClip 
      secured U.S. approval in 2013 – a full 5 ½ years after receiving 
      CE Mark and only after two substantial clinical trials (EVEREST I 
      and EVEREST II) were conducted. Even then, MitraClip barely squeaked by 
      a 5-3 FDA advisory panel vote for approval – which included five out of 
      nine panel members voting against the efficacy of the device – 
      and a sizeable post-marketing study was required. Nothing in the limited 
      Cardioband dataset suggests that it is any more efficacious than 
      MitraClip – U.S. approval is far from certain.
    

      Even if the PMA-enabling trial of Cardioband yields data supportive of 
      approval, the timeline for securing FDA approval will likely stretch 
      beyond 2020. COAPT, Abbott’s U.S. trial comparing MitraClip to 
      guideline-directed medical therapy (“GDMT”) in surgery-ineligible 
      patients with MR, has been enrolling for over 3 years, and based 
      on the pace of enrollment to date, it will take at least another year to 
      complete enrollment. We are hard-pressed to believe that HTWR would be 
      quicker than Abbott in enrolling patients in a future Cardioband pivotal 
      trial. Assuming it takes six months to finalize a trial design and 
      qualify study sites, 2-4 years to enroll the trial (as fast or faster 
      than both EVEREST II and COAPT enrollment), one year of patient 
      follow-up, 3-6 months to analyze and publish results, and 6-9 months of 
      FDA review time, FDA approval of Cardioband – if it is approved at all – would 
      not be secured until sometime between mid-2020 and the end of 2022.
    

      Third, acquiring Valtech would expose HTWR shareholders to a significant 
      risk that is completely out of the control of HTWR and Valtech 
      management: the results of the COAPT trial itself. The key opinion 
      leaders who presented at HTWR’s November 5, 2015 Investor Day (“Investor 
      Day”) expressed concern that COAPT will miss its ill-specified primary 
      endpoint (superiority in reducing recurrent heart failure 
      hospitalizations vs. GDMT). These same experts also stated that, should 
      this be the case, “reimbursement will disappear… overnight” for 
      MitraClip and any other transcatheter repair device, including 
      Cardioband. Securing reimbursement for Cardioband in the EU would then 
      likely require positive results from a rigorous, randomized (and risky) 
      clinical trial – which would add years of additional expense and cash 
      burn. Similarly, the consequence of a negative COAPT trial for 
      Cardioband would likely include increased scrutiny and more onerous 
      approval requirements from the FDA.
    

      Fourth, there are numerous potential competitors to Cardioband. HTWR 
      management has portrayed the transcatheter mitral valve repair market as 
      a two-horse race between MitraClip and Cardioband. Indeed, the financial 
      forecast HTWR management presented during their Investor Day assumes 
      Cardioband will hold 40% market share in transcatheter repair in 
      the future4. This is, to put it mildly, an overly optimistic 
      view of how the market will develop. Besides MitraClip, there are at 
      least 21 transcatheter mitral valve repair devices under development 
      today, at least ten of which are in human testing and/or are 
      already approved for use in Europe. This number does not consider the 
      internal efforts underway by both Edwards and Medtronic to develop 
      transcatheter repair technologies as well.
    

      Finally, it is not realistic to ascribe meaningful value to any of 
      Valtech’s products outside of Cardioband. Cardiovalve for mitral valve 
      replacement has yet to reach first-in-man, and even then, faces enormous 
      risk in demonstrating it is a viable device. Edwards recently shelved 
      its FORTIS valve for transcatheter mitral valve replacement only after a 
      series of adverse events were observed in the first 20 patients 
      receiving the device. With all due respect to the R&D team at Valtech – 
      if Edwards, the unquestionable leader in transcatheter approaches to 
      structural heart repair, with resources and expertise far beyond what 
      Valtech and HTWR can call upon, could not successfully internally 
      develop a transcatheter mitral valve replacement device, what 
      probability of success can investors realistically assign to Cardiovalve?
    

      Even if Cardiovalve successfully overcomes the developmental and 
      clinical hurdles to produce an approvable device, HTWR will be a late 
      entrant to a highly competitive market. We can identify at least 15 transcatheter 
      mitral valve replacement technologies under development, at least 
      seven of which have achieved first-in-man. In comparison, Valtech’s 
      Cardiovalve device does not yet have a finalized design, and even in a 
      best-case scenario, is 18 months away from first-in-man trials.
    

      Given the relative paucity of clinical data regarding the surgical treatment 
      of tricuspid regurgitation and the absence of any meaningful data 
      on transcatheter techniques to repair the tricuspid valve, we view the 
      opportunity for Cardioband and Cardiovalve in tricuspid repair and 
      replacement as highly uncertain and of limited value.
    

      As a result, while HTWR management may describe Valtech as “quadrupling 
      the number of milestones5” ahead of the 
      Company, we think there is a better term to describe these “milestones”: risks.
    

Management’s Investor Day Forecast for Valtech is Misleading


      The S-4 filed by HTWR on October 15, 2015 contained four “representative 
      cases” depicting management’s projections of Valtech’s financial 
      performance through 2025. During HTWR’s Investor Day, management 
      presented financial projections for Valtech from “Case 2” – the 
      second-most optimistic case – to investors. Typically, when management 
      teams publicly present financial projections, it is safe for investors 
      to assume these forecasts represent management’s best estimate of the 
      expected performance of the business in question. However, this is NOT 
      true of the forecast HTWR management presented for Valtech at HTWR’s 
      Investor Day.
    

During the Investor Day, HTWR knowingly misled investors by 
      presenting a forecast for Valtech that is nearly 40% ABOVE management’s 
      own probability-weighted forecast for the business. The indisputable 
      evidence confirming our assertion is contained within the fairness 
      opinion issued by the Company’s own financial advisors! The fairness 
      opinion issued by Canaccord Genuity to HTWR and published in the S-4 is 
      based upon HTWR management’s probability-adjusted revenue forecast for 
      Valtech6. It is a simple exercise to derive the revenue 
      forecast supporting Canaccord’s valuation calculations used in the 
      fairness opinion. The chart below illustrates the mismatch between HTWR 
      management’s probability-adjusted internal forecast for Valtech 
      and the publicly-presented forecast highlighted at HTWR’s 
      Investor Day.
    

See Graphic: HTWR's Revenue Projections for Valtech 


      It would not surprise us to hear management justify this after the fact 
      by claiming that “Case 2” is now their best forecast for Valtech. 
      Revising long-term revenue and synergy forecasts upward is a common 
      tactic used by managements to defend contested transactions. Such upward 
      revisions generally lack credibility and are usually discarded as soon 
      as the contest has ended. Management’s upward revision to their Valtech 
      forecast is no exception. It strains credulity to believe that 
      management’s revised forecast of how the mitral valve repair and 
      replacement market will evolve over the next ten years will be any more 
      accurate than the forecasts management provided to their financial 
      advisors just a few months prior. Additionally, the likelihood that 
      HTWR’s management team will still be in place ten years from now when 
      the performance of Valtech can actually be judged, is low. Management 
      therefore can promise the moon to HTWR investors knowing full well that 
      they are very unlikely to ever be held accountable for, nor will their 
      compensation be tied to, achieving the optimistic forecast presented at 
      HTWR’s Investor Day.
    

      Finally, even under the most wildly optimistic scenario provided in the 
      S-4, Valtech will generate no meaningful cash flow until 2021. 
      Therefore, the entire value (or lack thereof) of the proposed 
      transaction hinges on the performance of Valtech, and the state of the 
      competitive environment, at least 6-10 years from now. No one, not us, 
      not HTWR management, not Valtech’s competitors, and not the treating 
      physicians, can predict with any degree of certainty how the mitral 
      valve repair and replacement market will develop over the next decade, 
      much less predict which companies and devices will succeed. It is the 
      peak of hubris for management to claim otherwise and rationalize taking 
      on the enormous and unnecessary risks associated with Valtech, 
      when there is a clear, lower-risk path to significant shareholder value 
      creation: executing in the Company’s core VAD business.
    

HTWR’s VAD Franchise is Undervalued


      Given the significant amount of HTWR stock to be issued to Valtech 
      shareholders upon the close of the transaction, any evaluation of the 
      proposed acquisition of Valtech requires assessing the value of HTWR 
      shares. The true cost of the Valtech acquisition is not 
      based on the currently-depressed trading value of the HTWR shares to be 
      issued at the close of the transaction – it is based on the 
      risk-adjusted fair value of the Company’s long-term standalone business 
      plan. While the recent disclosure of a handful of adverse events 
      observed in the MVAD CE Mark trial is unfortunate; the attractive 
      fundamentals of HTWR’s core VAD franchise are unchanged from this 
      summer, when HTWR shares were trading well above $80. Barring a 
      catastrophic MVAD pump redesign – which by all accounts is highly 
      unlikely – HTWR shares should steadily close the gap to fair value as 
      MVAD returns to the clinic.
    

      We believe the fair value of HTWR shares is significantly greater than 
      the current trading price. During HTWR’s Investor Day, management 
      provided their long-term forecast for the VAD franchise, projecting 
      revenues of $524 million in 2020. This scenario yields a $141 per 
      share valuation for HTWR at the end of 20197, 
      representing over 200% upside from today’s levels.
    

      Of course, it is only prudent to examine a more conservative scenario 
      for the core business. HTWR shares are undervalued even if we assume 
      management’s forecast is aggressive. Under a scenario where VAD revenues 
      in 2020 are only $450 million, and revenue growth beyond 2020 is a more 
      modest 10% rather than the 18% projected by management, fair value at 
      the end of 2019 would be $92 a share – a 100% premium from 
      today’s levels8.
    

      We cannot comprehend, if the Board truly believes the forecast presented 
      at Investor Day, how the Board can justify the Valtech acquisition as 
      being a superior risk-adjusted alternative to simply executing in 
      the Company’s core business – a strategy which would double to triple 
      the value of HTWR in four years.
    

      As a result, it is false to portray the Valtech acquisition as being 
      “cheaper” now than it was when the acquisition announcement was 
      disclosed – the 30% upfront dilution, additional shares and warrants and 
      $375 million in milestone payments remain unchanged. Even in the 
      downside scenario discussed above, the future value of the consideration 
      offered to Valtech exceeds $900 million in cash and stock – an 
      amount greater than HTWR’s current market capitalization.
    

      Additionally, as we have stated previously, we believe the ultimate 
      destination of HTWR’s VAD portfolio is in the hands of a larger medical 
      device manufacturer. Bankers and senior executives at other medical 
      device companies (including companies that are the likely acquirers of 
      HTWR) have confirmed our shared view of the long-term attractiveness of 
      the VAD market. It is clear that the potential acquirers of HTWR are 
      very familiar with the Company, and would be able to move quickly to 
      evaluate acquiring HTWR should the opportunity present itself, now or in 
      the future.
    

      Using the valuation multiple Thoratec commanded in its sale to St. Jude, 
      the value of HTWR’s long-term plan in an acquisition is $178 per share 
      at the end of 2019 – a 290% increase from today9. 
      However, should the Company complete the acquisition of Valtech, we 
      believe a sale to a strategic acquirer becomes unlikely. As we discuss 
      below, due to the Board’s apparent failure to properly serve as the 
      shareholders’ fiduciaries, the acquisition of Valtech will slam the door 
      on any potential future acquisition of HTWR.
    

The Milestone Acceleration Provision Serves as a 10-Year Poison Pill


      Our conversations with HTWR shareholders revealed that many are either 
      unaware, or do not fully appreciate the impact, of the milestone payment 
      acceleration provision that the Board agreed to as part of the Valtech 
      acquisition proposal. As we detail below, this provision has the 
      potential to serve as a 10-year entrenchment mechanism for 
      HTWR’s Board and management team by creating a significant barrier to a 
      future sale of the Company. We are obligated to highlight the 
      significant cost and risk this provision imposes on HTWR shareholders 
      while benefiting the pecuniary interests of HTWR’s Board, management 
      team, and the current owners of Valtech.
    

      The Business Combination Agreement, dated September 1, 2015, between 
      HTWR, Valtech and certain of their affiliates (the “Valtech Acquisition 
      Agreement”) provides that, in the event HTWR is acquired within 10 
      years post the closing of the Valtech acquisition, all of the 
      milestone payments owed to Valtech’s former owners accelerate and 
      significantly lower the considerations HTWR shareholders will receive in 
      a sale. Specifically:
    

      1. The 700,000-share milestone payment associated with first-in-man 
      (“FIM”) trials of Cardioband Tricuspid or Cardiovalve becomes 
      immediately payable regardless of whether or not either product has 
      achieved FIM


      2. The warrants to purchase 850,000 HTWR shares at a strike price of 
      $83.73 that vest upon achieving $75 million in trailing twelve-month 
      (“TTM”) revenues from Valtech products immediately vest regardless of 
      whether or not this level of revenue has been achieved


      3. $175 million of the $375 million milestone payment associated with 
      achieving $450 million in TTM revenues from Valtech products becomes 
      immediately payable


      4. $75 million of the $375 million milestone payment becomes payable at 
      a lowered TTM revenue threshold of $75 million, rather than $450 
      million
    

      5. The remaining $125 million of the $375 million milestone payment 
      becomes payable at a lowered TTM revenue threshold of $150 million, 
      rather than $450 million
    

      It is important that all HTWR directors take time to fully understand 
      the implications of this acceleration provision for shareholders of the 
      Company. The acceleration provision would force HTWR’s acquirer to make 
      milestones payments to Valtech’s former owners regardless of 
      Valtech’s performance. Thus, the raison d'être of utilizing a 
      milestone payment provision – to mitigate the damage to shareholders 
      from the underperformance of an acquired asset – is rendered pointless.
    

      For illustrative purposes, let us assume that a potential acquirer of 
      HTWR is willing to pay $100 a share for the Company, pre-Valtech. 
      Additionally, assume this same acquirer values the Valtech assets at 
      $300 million. Due to the dilution and milestone acceleration provision 
      associated with the Valtech acquisition, rather than receiving the full 
      $100 per share, HTWR shareholders would instead only receive $78 a 
      share10 in an acquisition, a 22% discount to the 
      pre-Valtech per-share value of the Company. The table below illustrates 
      the price per share HTWR shareholders would receive in an acquisition 
      based on a range of values for HTWR standalone and Valtech.
    







           
        



           
        

Acquisition Value of HTWR Post-Valtech












          Acquirer's Valuation of Valtech ($M)
        













          $100M
        

           
        

          $200M
        

           
        

          $300M
        

           
        

          $400M
        

           
        

          $500M
        





          HTWR Standalone

          
            Acquisition Price
          

            per Share
          




          $80
        



          $54
        



          $59
        



          $63
        



          $67
        



          $71
        







          $90
        



          $62
        



          $66
        



          $70
        



          $74
        



          $79
        







          $100
        



          $70
        



          $74
        



$78




          $82
        



          $86
        







          $110
        



          $78
        



          $82
        



          $86
        



          $90
        



          $94
        







          $120
        



          $87
        



          $91
        



          $95
        



          $99
        



          $102
        







      In order for HTWR shareholders to actually receive the full $100 a share 
      in an acquisition of HTWR post-Valtech, the acquirer must assign a value 
      to Valtech in excess of $850 million – an 
      amount greater than HTWR’s current market capitalization. This 
      “breakeven” valuation for Valtech only increases as the value of HTWR’s 
      core VAD franchise increases.
    

      The ramifications of the acceleration provision are troubling. Since the 
      most logical acquirers of HTWR already possess assets that would be 
      either partly or wholly duplicative to Valtech’s portfolio, it is 
      unlikely that these acquirers would assign much value to Valtech. 
      Unfortunately for HTWR shareholders, the acceleration provision would 
      force these potential acquirers of HTWR to pay full value for the 
      Valtech assets. As a result, this acceleration provision effectively 
      serves, whether intentionally or not, as a ten-year poison pill. 
      Rather than trading with an embedded M&A premium like most of its 
      mid-cap medical device peers, the acquisition of Valtech will cause HTWR 
      shares to trade with an M&A discount.


The Valtech Acquisition Entrenches the Board and Management Team at 
      the Expense of Shareholders


      Our conversations with numerous bankers and industry executives have 
      supported our assertion that 1) HTWR’s ownership of Valtech makes the 
      former a less attractive acquisition target, and 2) HTWR’s offer was far 
      in excess of other, if any, potential competing bids for Valtech. Even 
      industry experts and analysts who favorably view Valtech’s products 
      cannot justify the high price offered by HTWR. Additionally, the most 
      likely potential acquirers of HTWR have categorically expressed to us 
      that they would have no interest in acquiring HTWR should the Valtech 
      acquisition close. This fact, which directly contradicts claims 
      being made by HTWR’s management team, is particularly disheartening as 
      many HTWR shareholders have an investment thesis predicated upon an 
      eventual sale of the Company to a large strategic acquirer at a 
      significant premium.
    

      While we agree with many of the Company’s shareholders that the ultimate 
      destiny for HTWR is a sale to a strategic acquirer, let us be clear – we 
      are not advocating for a sale of the 
      Company today. Given the currently depressed share price and uncertainty 
      regarding the restart of the MVAD CE Mark clinical trial, we believe it 
      is unlikely that the Board would be able to negotiate a sale of the 
      Company at a premium that would be acceptable to shareholders today. 
      However, it is unacceptable to HTWR shareholders to permanently impair a 
      future sale of HTWR by acquiring an asset – Valtech – which makes the 
      Company less attractive to the most likely acquirers.
    

      Perhaps the Valtech acquisition proposal is a product of misaligned 
      incentives between management and HTWR shareholders. It is not lost on 
      us that the Board and management team have collectively purchased 
      a total of only 4,150 shares (valued at $300,000) of HTWR on the open 
      market over the last five years, while selling nearly 680,000 shares 
      (valued at $56 million) over the same time period11. Given 
      the sparse shareholdings and past trading history of the Board and 
      management team, investors are left to wonder if HTWR leadership has an 
      incentive to continue receiving (and subsequently selling) significant 
      annual stock grants, rather than positioning the Company for an eventual 
      sale. Unfortunately for HTWR shareholders, the Valtech transaction would 
      increase the likelihood that HTWR remains independent and the annual 
      stock grants keep flowing.
    

      Additionally, the Valtech transaction has the added consequence of 
      disenfranchising current HTWR shareholders. Should the acquisition of 
      Valtech close, Valtech and HTWR would become wholly-owned subsidiaries 
      of a new corporation, HW Global, Inc. Conveniently for the Board, HW 
      Global, as a newly formed company, would not be required to hold a 
      shareholder meeting for the election of directors until the spring of 
      2017. Additionally, public disclosures show that the Company intends to 
      further disenfranchise independent shareholders by adopting a classified 
      board structure so that only a third of directors will be up for 
      election in each year. Some of HTWR’s largest shareholders have 
      expressed to us their desire, shared by us, to see new directors added 
      to the Board who possess the capital allocation and valuation expertise 
      HTWR so desperately needs. Denying shareholders’ ability to vote for 
      Board change by delaying the Company’s annual meeting would only serve 
      to further frustrate the owners of the Company while highlighting the 
      apparently self-serving decision-making of the Board. Even if HW Global 
      chooses to hold its first annual meeting at an earlier date, this would 
      constitute a meaningless platitude, as Valtech shareholders and HTWR 
      insiders would together control approximately 25% of the new shares of 
      HW Global – making it almost impossible for the independent shareholders 
      of HTWR to have a meaningful say in any strategic or governance changes, 
      including the composition of the HW Global board.
    

Shareholder Representation is Needed in the Boardroom


      We remain baffled by the decision-making process that led to the 
      decision to acquire Valtech. We cannot comprehend how the Board came to 
      the conclusion that pursuing an incredibly risky, expensive acquisition 
      of a pre-revenue company was a better risk-adjusted alternative 
      than continuing to execute in the Company’s core VAD business, and/or 
      selling the Company at a significant premium. The inclusion of the 
      acceleration provision in the Valtech Acquisition Agreement and the 
      establishment of HW Global with numerous unfriendly governance features 
      only increase our concerns regarding the Board’s oversight. Since the 
      acceleration provision and governance structure cannot benefit HTWR 
      shareholders under any scenario, it is clear to us that the Board either 
      neglected; or, worse yet, willfully ignored, their fiduciary 
      responsibilities to HTWR shareholders in favor of their own interests 
      and those of HTWR management.
    

      As a result, we will campaign aggressively and forcefully against the 
      proposed acquisition of Valtech.
    

The Board Must Terminate the Valtech Acquisition Without Delay


      As HTWR shareholders, we reiterate our call for the Board to immediately 
      terminate the Valtech Acquisition Agreement. We note that the Valtech 
      Acquisition Agreement gives the Board the flexibility to change its 
      recommendation of the transaction at any time. Every day and every 
      dollar the Board and management team spend on a futile campaign to 
      defend this unjustifiable acquisition would be far better spent on the 
      Company’s core VAD business. Rather than escalating this confrontation 
      with shareholders, put this strategic mistake behind us so as to 
      minimize any further damage to HTWR’s investors.
    

      Sincerely yours,
    

      Glenn W. WellingManaging Member
    

About Engaged Capital:


      Engaged Capital, LLC (“Engaged Capital”) was established in 2012 by a 
      group of professionals with significant experience in activist investing 
      in North America and was seeded by Grosvenor Capital Management, L.P., 
      one of the oldest and largest global alternative investment managers. 
      Engaged Capital is a limited liability company owned by its principals 
      and formed to create long-term shareholder value by bringing an owner’s 
      perspective to the managements and boards of undervalued public 
      companies. Engaged Capital manages both a long-only and long/short North 
      American equity fund. Engaged Capital’s efforts and resources are 
      dedicated to a single investment style, “Constructive Activism” with a 
      focus on delivering superior, long-term, risk-adjusted returns for 
      investors. Engaged Capital is based in Newport Beach, California.
    




CERTAIN INFORMATION CONCERNING THE PARTICIPANTS


      Engaged Capital, LLC, together with the other the participants named 
      herein, intends to file a preliminary proxy statement and an 
      accompanying proxy card with the Securities and Exchange Commission 
      (“SEC”) to be used to solicit votes against the Business Combination 
      Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2015, by and among HeartWare 
      International, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the “Company”), Valtech 
      Cardio, Ltd., a private company incorporated under the laws of Israel, 
      HW Global, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a direct wholly owned 
      subsidiary of the Company (“Holdco”), HW Merger Sub, Inc., a Delaware 
      corporation and a direct wholly owned subsidiary of Holdco, Valor Merger 
      Sub Ltd., a private company incorporated under the laws of Israel and a 
      direct wholly owned subsidiary of Holdco, and Valor Shareholder 
      Representative, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and certain 
      related transactions, at a special meeting of stockholders of the 
      Company (the “Special Meeting”).
    

      Further, Engaged Capital, LLC, together with the other the participants 
      named herein, intends to file a preliminary proxy statement and an 
      accompanying proxy card with the SEC to be used to solicit votes for the 
      election of their slate of three highly-qualified director nominees at 
      the 2016 annual meeting of stockholders of the Company, as applicable.
    

      ENGAGED CAPITAL STRONGLY ADVISES ALL STOCKHOLDERS OF THE COMPANY TO READ 
      THE PROXY STATEMENT AND OTHER PROXY MATERIALS AS THEY BECOME AVAILABLE 
      BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. SUCH PROXY MATERIALS 
      WILL BE AVAILABLE AT NO CHARGE ON THE SEC’S WEB SITE AT HTTP://WWW.SEC.GOV. 
      IN ADDITION, THE PARTICIPANTS IN THIS PROXY SOLICITATION WILL PROVIDE 
      COPIES OF THE PROXY STATEMENT WITHOUT CHARGE, WHEN AVAILABLE, UPON 
      REQUEST. REQUESTS FOR COPIES SHOULD BE DIRECTED TO THE PARTICIPANTS’ 
      PROXY SOLICITOR.
    

      The participants in the proxy solicitation are Engaged Capital Master 
      Feeder I, LP (“Engaged Capital Master I”), Engaged Capital Master Feeder 
      II, LP (“Engaged Capital Master II”), Engaged Capital I, LP (“Engaged 
      Capital I”), Engaged Capital I Offshore, Ltd. (“Engaged Capital 
      Offshore”), Engaged Capital II, LP (“Engaged Capital II”), Engaged 
      Capital II Offshore Ltd. (“Engaged Capital Offshore II”), Engaged 
      Capital, LLC (“Engaged Capital”), Engaged Capital Holdings, LLC 
      (“Engaged Holdings”), Glenn W. Welling, Shawn T McCormick, Brendan B. 
      Springstubb and Scott R. Ward (collectively, the “Participants”).
    

      As of the date hereof, Engaged Capital Master I beneficially owned 
      71,800 shares of Common Stock. As of the date hereof, Engaged Capital 
      Master II beneficially owned 158,200 shares of Common Stock. Engaged 
      Capital I, as a feeder fund of Engaged Capital Master I, may be deemed 
      the beneficial owner of the 71,800 shares of Common Stock beneficially 
      owned by Engaged Capital Master I. Engaged Capital Offshore, as a feeder 
      fund of Engaged Capital Master I, may be deemed the beneficial owner of 
      the 71,800 shares of Common Stock beneficially owned by Engaged Capital 
      Master I. Engaged Capital II, as a feeder fund of Engaged Capital Master 
      II, may be deemed the beneficial owner of the 158,200 shares of Common 
      Stock beneficially owned by Engaged Capital Master II. Engaged Capital 
      Offshore II, as a feeder fund of Engaged Capital Master II, may be 
      deemed the beneficial owner of the 158,200 shares of Common Stock 
      beneficially owned by Engaged Capital Master II. Engaged Capital, as the 
      investment adviser to each of Engaged Capital Master I and Engaged 
      Capital Master II, may be deemed to beneficially own the 230,000 shares 
      of Common Stock owned in the aggregate by Engaged Capital Master I and 
      Engaged Capital Master II. Engaged Holdings, as the managing member of 
      Engaged Capital, may be deemed to beneficially own the 230,000 shares of 
      Common Stock owned in the aggregate by Engaged Capital Master I and 
      Engaged Capital Master II. Mr. Welling, as the founder and chief 
      investment officer of Engaged Capital and the sole member of Engaged 
      Holdings, may be deemed to beneficially own the 230,000 shares of Common 
      Stock owned in the aggregate by Engaged Capital Master I and Engaged 
      Capital Master II. As of the date hereof, Messrs. McCormick, Springstubb 
      and Ward do not beneficially own any shares of Common Stock.
    

1 Goldstein, Daniel, et al. "Two-year outcomes of surgical 
      treatment of severe ischemic mitral regurgitation." New England Journal 
      of Medicine (2015).2 CEO Doug Godshall, HTWR Investor 
      Day, 11/5/20153 CEO Doug Godshall, HTWR Investor Day, 
      11/5/20154 HTWR Investor Day presentation, Slide 2745 
      HTWR CEO Doug Godshall, Canaccord Genuity Medical Technology and 
      Diagnostics Forum, 11/19/20156 HW Global form S-4 dated 
      11/25/2015, page 547 See enclosure for calculation8 
      See enclosure for calculation9 See enclosure for 
      calculation10 See enclosure for calculation11 
      Includes all current directors and named executive officers. Data per 
      HTWR’s SEC filings and Factset.
    




Contacts

Investor Contact:Morrow & Co., LLCTom 
      Ball, 203-658-9400tomball@morrowco.comorJohn 
      Ferguson, 203-658-9400jferguson@morrowco.comorMedia 
      Contact:Bayfield Strategy, Inc.Riyaz Lalani, 416-907-9365rlalani@bayfieldstrategy.com











Release Summary
Engaged Capital, LLC sends third letter to the Board of HeartWare International, Inc., reiterating the need to immediately terminate the proposed acquisition of Valtech Cardio, Ltd.







Contacts

Investor Contact:Morrow & Co., LLCTom 
      Ball, 203-658-9400tomball@morrowco.comorJohn 
      Ferguson, 203-658-9400jferguson@morrowco.comorMedia 
      Contact:Bayfield Strategy, Inc.Riyaz Lalani, 416-907-9365rlalani@bayfieldstrategy.com









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up














Engaged Capital  I  Strategy









 
















Undervalued, Premium Assets

Small - Mid Cap Focus







 Companies with strong, defensible franchises
Current market value well below 
                    intrinsic
                    value (>30% PV)
Identifiable reasons for value gap
Multiple paths for value creation
Management and/or Board interested 
                    in creating
                    value for shareholders


$500M - $8B market cap offers
                      
                      highest returns
Most activist funds too large to 
                    invest there
Under-covered by Wall Street research
Engaged Capital’s deep research
                      expertise maximizes opportunities
Our Wall Street connections help 
                    initiate coverage




 
 


Information Advantage
Private Equity Style in Public
                Equities







Knowledge based, phased 
                    investment opportunity
 Stronger conviction leads to 
                    larger investment
Better risk management and 
                    increased returns
Uncorrelated returns to the equity market through catalyst
                          based investing



Engaged Capital becomes the 
                    catalyst for change
Invest for influence not control
Do not have to pay a control premium
High impact dialogue with management/Board
Focus on portfolio companies’ long-term
                      interests (hold 2-5 years)



 

































Engaged Capital LLC Buys Rent-A-Center, Parexel International, Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Co, ... - Nasdaq.com

















































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search










































Engaged Capital LLC Buys Rent-A-Center, Parexel International, Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Co, ...


March 23, 2017, 10:38:01 PM EDT
By insider, GuruFocus









































Shutterstock photo


Engaged Capital LLCNew Purchases: RCII , HMHC ,Added Positions: PRXL , TIVO, MED, JMBA, STKL,Reduced Positions:BDSI, IWM, TRS,Sold Out:SCOR, LBY,For the details of Engaged Capital LLC's stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=Engaged+Capital+LLCThese are the top 5 holdings of Engaged Capital LLCBenchmark Electronics Inc ( BHE ) - 2,428,221 shares, 24.15% of the total portfolio.TiVo Corp ( TIVO ) - 2,525,000 shares, 17.2% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 3.06%SunOpta Inc ( STKL ) - 6,515,084 shares, 14.97% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 1.38%Medifast Inc ( MED ) - 772,465 shares, 10.48% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 4.75%Rent-A-Center Inc ( RCII ) - 2,302,376 shares, 8.44% of the total portfolio. New PositionNew Purchase: Rent-A-Center Inc ( RCII )Engaged Capital LLC initiated holdings in Rent-A-Center Inc. The purchase prices were between $8.93 and $13.09, with an estimated average price of $11.14. The stock is now traded at around $8.74. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 8.44%. The holdings were 2,302,376 shares as of 2016-12-31.New Purchase: Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Co (HMHC)Engaged Capital LLC initiated holdings in Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Co. The purchase prices were between $9.35 and $13.4, with an estimated average price of $11.71. The stock is now traded at around $9.55. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.76%. The holdings were 213,766 shares as of 2016-12-31.Added: Parexel International Corp (PRXL)Engaged Capital LLC added to the holdings in Parexel International Corp by 267.18%. The purchase prices were between $55.73 and $70.4, with an estimated average price of $62.71. The stock is now traded at around $61.82. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 1.44%. The holdings were 92,327 shares as of 2016-12-31.Sold Out: comScore Inc (SCOR)Engaged Capital LLC sold out the holdings in comScore Inc. The sale prices were between $27.11 and $34.5, with an estimated average price of $30.12.Sold Out: Libbey Inc (LBY)Engaged Capital LLC sold out the holdings in Libbey Inc. The sale prices were between $15.62 and $20.68, with an estimated average price of $18.06.Reduced: BioDelivery Sciences International Inc (BDSI)Engaged Capital LLC reduced to the holdings in BioDelivery Sciences International Inc by 89.94%. The sale prices were between $1.6 and $2.64, with an estimated average price of $2.04. The stock is now traded at around $1.93. The impact to the portfolio due to this sale was -1.65%. Engaged Capital LLC still held 188,750 shares as of 2016-12-31.Reduced: iShares Russell 2000 (IWM)Engaged Capital LLC reduced to the holdings in iShares Russell 2000 by 38.92%. The sale prices were between $115 and $138.31, with an estimated average price of $128.01. The stock is now traded at around $134.78. The impact to the portfolio due to this sale was -0.89%. Engaged Capital LLC still held 30,922 shares as of 2016-12-31.PRXL 15-Year Financial DataThe intrinsic value of PRXLPeter Lynch Chart of PRXLPremium MembersThis article first appeared on GuruFocus .



The views and opinions expressed herein are the views and opinions of the author and do not necessarily reflect those of Nasdaq, Inc.











This article appears in:
Investing                           
                            
                                , Stocks





Referenced Symbols:

                                        BHE
                                    
, 

                                        TIVO
                                    
, 

                                        STKL
                                    
, 

                                        MED
                                    
, 

                                        RCII
                                    












More from GuruFocus



Subscribe




This Powerful Chart Made Peter Lynch 29% A Year For 13 Years
A Strategy Ben Graham Used for 30 Years
Market Overvalued, How to Invest?














Related Stocks Articles




Subscribe







Booming Commercial Jet Deliveries Boost Embraer


						7/28/2017 11:52 AM
					



WisdomTree Falls Short Despite Attracting More Assets


						7/28/2017 11:52 AM
					



Deckers' Gloomy Outlook Overshadows Solid Results


						7/28/2017 11:43 AM
					














Contributor:GuruFocus
Stock Picks, Portfolios



Follow on:

























Most Popular




Highest Rated








Mitel To Acquire ShoreTel - Quick Facts
Sientra Completes Acquisition of Miramar Labs®
Seagate Technology PLC Q4 Profit Rises 174%
LedgerX gets U.S. approval for derivatives on digital currencies
U.S. Fines Frontier, American And Delta For Violating Consumer







Shareholders Approve Major Structural Change to Top Performing...
Yatra Attains Leadership Position in Corporate Travel With the...
Mitel To Acquire ShoreTel - Quick Facts
Miller Heiman Group Selects CallidusCloud Datahug for Pipeline...
Tractor Supply Company Reports Second Quarter Results




View All Highest Rated






















Research Brokers before you trade



		Compare Online Brokers
	


Want to trade FX?



		Visit our Forex Broker Center 
	
















Find a Credit Card



                    Select a credit card product by:
                


 Card Type
 Credit Score
 Card Issuer



                    Select an offer:
                





0% APR Credit CardsAirline Credit CardsBalance Transfer Credit CardsBusiness Credit CardsCash Back Credit CardsCharge CardsCharge Cards for BusinessEMV Smart ChipsGas Cards & Auto RewardsHome Improvement Rewards Credit CardsInstant Approval Credit CardsLow Interest Credit CardsNo Annual Fee Credit CardsNo Foreign Transaction Fee Credit CardsPoints Rewards Credit CardsPrepaid & Debit CardsReward Credit CardsStudent Credit CardsTop 10 Best Credit Card Deals and Offers




Bad CreditCredit Quality AverageCredit Quality ExcellentCredit Quality FairCredit Quality GoodLimited or No Credit HistoryPersonal Loans




American ExpressAmerican Express Airline CardsAmerican Express Business CardsAmerican Express Cash Back Credit CardsAmerican Express Charge CardsBarclaycardCapital OneCapital One Cash BackCapital One Fair CreditCapital One MilesCapital One PointsCapital One Prepaid Credit CardsChaseCiti Credit CardsDiscoverDiscover CashbackDiscover MilesDiscover Student Credit CardsMasterCard Credit CardsU.S. BankUSAAUSAA SavingsVisa Credit Cards







Search





Data Provided by BankRate.com






Stocks

Referenced





BHE








100%



Rate It





TIVO








93%



Rate It





STKL








50%



Rate It





MED








80%



Rate It





RCII








100%



Rate It































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX










































Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














US Capital Engaged in $15M Convertible Note for 480 Holdings, LLC 






























PRWeb
Home
News Center
Blog



United States
United Kingdom
France

			Login
		
			Create a free account
		




RSS


Email Newsletters


Put PRWeb on your site




US Capital Engaged in $15M Convertible Note for 480 Holdings, LLC



Share Article

















Private investment bank backs the continued growth of an early stage premium bottled water firm






San Francisco, California (PRWEB)
June 16, 2017
 US Capital Partners has been engaged as the exclusive advisor for the 480 Holdings, LLC (“480 Holdings”) $15m convertible note. The company plans to be a premium Fiji natural spring water bottling company under the brand Yaqara Water™ (“Yaqara”).
Supported by the beverage consulting leader Beverage Marketing Corporation (BMC), the company has developed an innovative and humanitarian approach that contributes 1.0% of its annual gross revenues. This will assist more than 1,700 local village members by improving their living conditions, providing access to education and changing lives for generations to come. 
To date, the company has already accomplished significant steps towards its growth goals, which include securing the leases for water extraction, bottling plant and its accompanying solar energy system in the Yaqara Valley in Fiji.
“480 Holdings is poised to release its product into the market at just the right time,” said Jeffrey Sweeney, Chairman and CEO at US Capital. “The bottled water industry is now flourishing with 2016 retail sales reaching $32 billion in America alone¹. Consumers are accelerating their consumption of healthful beverage options and imported water is the leading growth segment. The opportunity to participate in 480 Holdings’ $15 million convertible note raise will soon be open to eligible investors through our digital investment platform, available at http://www.uscgs.com, which offers a curated selection of private placement opportunities.”
About 480 Holdings, LLC
Formed in 2015, 480 Holdings Limited, LLC is based in Tijeras, New Mexico.  The company plans to bottle and sell premium Fiji natural spring water under the brand Yaqara Water™. To date, the Company’s primary work has organized and prepared for the extraction, bottling, marketing and sales of bottled drinking water from Fiji. CEO Patrick Scanlon has over 40 years of project management and marketing experience, with 18 years spent at Walt Disney Imagineering as their Senior Vice President and more.  The Company’s Board of Directors includes Brian Sudano, COO of the Beverage Marketing Corporation, a leading expert in the beverage industry worldwide and Douglas Holt, recently retired vice president and general manager of TaylorMade-Adidas Golf who was responsible for $1.7 billion in international sales and brand management.  Ed Gawronski is the recently appointed CMO, an accomplished senior marketing executive experienced in growing high profile beverage and retail consumer brands.
About US Capital Partners Inc.
Since 1998, US Capital Partners has provided structured, custom financing solutions to private and public companies in the United States and abroad. Headquartered in San Francisco, US Capital Partners, operating with its subsidiary US Capital Global Securities Inc., is a full-service private investment bank with a wide distribution for debt and equity private placements. The group makes debt investments between $500,000 and $50 million, participates in debt facilities, and offers asset management, financial advisory services for buy-side and sell-side engagements, and capital formation, including early-stage financings of equity and debt.
To learn more about this recent engagement or about how your business can secure the investment banking services it needs, email Jeffrey Sweeney, Chairman and CEO, at jsweeney(at)uscapitalpartners(dot)net or call +1 (415) 889-1010.
Private placements on US Capital Partners' next-generation digital investment platform are offered by the firm's registered broker dealer subsidiary, US Capital Global Securities, Inc., member FINRA/SIPC.
¹ Source: DrinkTell Database with Market Forecasts, Beverage Marketing Corporation (2016)



Share article on social media or email:









View article via:
											Pdf
										
											Print
										






Contact Author

Fana Richardson
media@uscapitalpartners.net +1 4158891039
				Email >
			Fana Richardson
US Capital Partners Inc. 415-889-1010
				Email >
			
US Capital Partnerssince: 01/1998
				Like >
			
US Capital Partners Inc.
Follow us on


									Visit website
								


Media
US Capital Partners logoUSCP logoUS Capital Partners logoLogoUS Capital Engaged in $15M Convertible Note for 480 Holdings, LLCUS Capital Engaged in $15M Convertible Note for 480 Holdings, LLCUS Capital Engaged in $15M Convertible Note for 480 Holdings, LLC480 Holdings, LLC






News Center


 

Engaged Capital Holdings LLC's involvement in venture capital (via Engaged Capital Ii Lp, Engaged Capital Co-invest I Lp, Engaged Capital Co-invest Iii Lp)































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/people/157148-engaged-capital-holdings-llcsection=people&subsection=detail&id=157148




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Engaged Capital HoldingsLLCGet alertedif Engaged Capital Holdings LLC gets funded!Engaged Capital Holdings LLCEngaged Capital Ii Lp - Executive OfficerEngaged Capital Co-invest I Lp - Executive OfficerEngaged Capital Co-invest Iii Lp - Executive OfficerDeals involving Engaged Capital Holdings LLC$2,260,000 raised with Engaged Capital Ii Lp on October, 2013$16,000,000 raised with Engaged Capital Co-invest I Lp on August, 2015$50,000,000 raised with Engaged Capital Co-invest Iii Lp on February, 2016Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Some of the profile information was collected using the Crunchbase API. For more details on the profile, please check Engaged Capital Hold... on Crunchbase.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!




Engaged Capital LLC Top Holdings 13F Filings




















































Home
Articles
Latest Filings
All Funds
Stocks Being Bought
Stocks Being Sold
Insider Buying







FREE registration required to continue...

                
                You have viewed 6 pages within the last 6 hours.  To continue, please register at Holdings Channel for unlimited
		page views and our free weekly newsletter, by entering your name and email address below.  Registration is absolutely free.
By registering, you agree to our privacy policy & terms of use.
                
		If you are in Canada, you must click here for alternate registration page.

                

                
                Problems with your registration ''sticking?''  Enable your browser to receive our ''cookie'' to resolve.
                Other questions? Email us at: info@holdingschannel.com


Engaged Capital LLC Top Holdings 13F Filings | www.HoldingsChannel.com | 
Copyright © 2013 - 2017, All Rights Reserved



Nothing in Holdings Channel is intended to be investment advice, nor does it represent the opinion of, counsel
from, or recommendations by BNK Invest Inc. or any of its affiliates, subsidiaries or partners.  
  None of the information contained herein constitutes a recommendation that any particular security, portfolio,
 transaction, or investment strategy is suitable for any specific person.  All viewers agree that under no
circumstances will BNK Invest, Inc,. its subsidiaries, partners, officers, employees, affiliates, or agents be held
liable for any loss or damage caused by your reliance on information obtained.  By visiting, using or viewing this site, you 
agree to the following 
Full Disclaimer & Terms of Use and 
Privacy Policy.  Video widget and market videos powered by Market News Video.  Quote and option data delayed at 
least 15 minutes; stock quote data powered by Ticker Technologies, and Mergent. Contact Holdings Channel; Meet Our Editorial Staff.
























ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC SC 13D/A Filing Concerning STKL on 2016-10-07  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active


















Schedule  13D/A















Filed by:


					ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC
				


Total Shares:

                          6,426,435
			


Subject Company:


					SunOpta Inc.
                  -
                  View Complete Ownership History

          Backtest
        



Filed as of Date:
10/12/2016


Event Date:
10/07/2016


Overall % Ownership:
7.5


Reporting Persons



Name
SoleVoting Power
SharedVoting Power
SoleDispositive Power
SharedDispositive Power
AggregateAmount Owned
Percentof class


Engaged Capital Flagship Master Fund, LP
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
3.4%


Engaged Capital CoInvest IV, LP
3,191,639
0
3,191,639
0
3,191,639
3.7%


Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, LP
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
3.4%


Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, Ltd
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
0
2,896,833
3.4%


Engaged Capital, LLC
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
7.5%


Engaged Capital Holdings, LLC
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
7.5%


Glenn W Welling
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
0
6,426,435
7.5%





					View Original Filing on Edgar's
				


Raw Filing Contents
0000921895-16-005854.txt : 20161012
0000921895-16-005854.hdr.sgml : 20161012
20161012160426
ACCESSION NUMBER:		0000921895-16-005854
CONFORMED SUBMISSION TYPE:	SC 13D/A
PUBLIC DOCUMENT COUNT:		1
FILED AS OF DATE:		20161012
DATE AS OF CHANGE:		20161012

SUBJECT COMPANY:	

	COMPANY DATA:	
		COMPANY CONFORMED NAME:			SunOpta Inc.
		CENTRAL INDEX KEY:			0000351834
		STANDARD INDUSTRIAL CLASSIFICATION:	WHOLESALE-FARM PRODUCT RAW MATERIALS [5150]
		IRS NUMBER:				000000000
		FISCAL YEAR END:			0101

	FILING VALUES:
		FORM TYPE:		SC 13D/A
		SEC ACT:		1934 Act
		SEC FILE NUMBER:	005-59617
		FILM NUMBER:		161933261

	BUSINESS ADDRESS:	
		STREET 1:		2233 ARGENTIA ROAD
		STREET 2:		SUITE 401
		CITY:			MISSISSAUGA
		STATE:			A6
		ZIP:			L5N 2X7
		BUSINESS PHONE:		(905) 455-1990

	MAIL ADDRESS:	
		STREET 1:		2233 ARGENTIA ROAD
		STREET 2:		SUITE 401
		CITY:			MISSISSAUGA
		STATE:			A6
		ZIP:			L5N 2X7

	FORMER COMPANY:	
		FORMER CONFORMED NAME:	SUNOPTA INC
		DATE OF NAME CHANGE:	20031107

	FORMER COMPANY:	
		FORMER CONFORMED NAME:	STAKE TECHNOLOGY LTD
		DATE OF NAME CHANGE:	19940901

FILED BY:		

	COMPANY DATA:	
		COMPANY CONFORMED NAME:			Engaged Capital LLC
		CENTRAL INDEX KEY:			0001559771
		IRS NUMBER:				454591052
		STATE OF INCORPORATION:			DE
		FISCAL YEAR END:			1231

	FILING VALUES:
		FORM TYPE:		SC 13D/A

	BUSINESS ADDRESS:	
		STREET 1:		610 NEWPORT CENTER DRIVE
		STREET 2:		SUITE 250
		CITY:			NEWPORT BEACH
		STATE:			CA
		ZIP:			92660
		BUSINESS PHONE:		949-734-7900

	MAIL ADDRESS:	
		STREET 1:		610 NEWPORT CENTER DRIVE
		STREET 2:		SUITE 250
		CITY:			NEWPORT BEACH
		STATE:			CA
		ZIP:			92660


SC 13D/A
1
sc13da109455021_10122016.htm
AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO THE SCHEDULE 13D

sc13da109455021_10122016.htm




UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549


SCHEDULE 13D
(Rule 13d-101)


INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN STATEMENTS FILED PURSUANT
TO § 240.13d-1(a) AND AMENDMENTS THERETO FILED PURSUANT TO
§ 240.13d-2(a)


(Amendment No. 1)1













SunOpta Inc.


(Name of Issuer)






















Common Shares, no par value per share











(Title of Class of Securities)








8676EP108



(CUSIP Number)
 

GLENN W. WELLING
ENGAGED CAPITAL, LLC
610 Newport Center Drive, Suite 250
Newport Beach, California 92660
(949) 734-7900
 






STEVE WOLOSKY
OLSHAN FROME WOLOSKY LLP
1325 Avenue of the Americas
New York, New York 10019
(212) 451-2300

(Name, Address and Telephone Number of Person
Authorized to Receive Notices and Communications)













October 7, 2016











(Date of Event Which Requires Filing of This Statement)


If the filing person has previously filed a statement on Schedule 13G to report the acquisition that is the subject of this Schedule 13D, and is filing this schedule because of §§ 240.13d-1(e), 240.13d-1(f) or 240.13d-1(g), check the following box ¨.


Note:  Schedules filed in paper format shall include a signed original and five copies of the schedule, including all exhibits.  See § 240.13d-7 for other parties to whom copies are to be sent.




_______________
1              The remainder of this cover page shall be filled out for a reporting person’s initial filing on this form with respect to the subject class of securities, and for any subsequent amendment containing information which would alter disclosures provided in a prior cover page.


The information required on the remainder of this cover page shall not be deemed to be “filed” for the purpose of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (“Act”) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section of the Act but shall be subject to all other provisions of the Act (however, see the Notes).

 


  


  





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital Flagship Master Fund, LP



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
WC




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
CAYMAN ISLANDS





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


2,896,833






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


2,896,833






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
2,896,833







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
3.4%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
PN











 


2





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital Co-Invest IV, LP



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
WC




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
DELAWARE





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


3,191,639






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


3,191,639






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
3,191,639







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
3.7%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
PN











 


3





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, LP



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
OO




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
DELAWARE





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


2,896,833






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


2,896,833






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
2,896,833







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
3.4%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
PN











 


4





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, Ltd.



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
OO




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
CAYMAN ISLANDS





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


2,896,833






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


2,896,833






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
2,896,833







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
3.4%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
CO











 


5





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital, LLC 



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
OO




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
DELAWARE





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


6,426,435






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


6,426,435






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
6,426,435







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
7.5%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
OO











 


6





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Engaged Capital Holdings, LLC



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
OO




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
DELAWARE





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


6,426,435






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


6,426,435






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
6,426,435







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
7.5%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
OO











 


7





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 




1


NAME OF REPORTING PERSON
 
Glenn W. Welling



2


CHECK THE APPROPRIATE BOX IF A MEMBER OF A GROUP


  (a) o
  (b) o



3


SEC USE ONLY
 



4


SOURCE OF FUNDS

 
OO




5


CHECK BOX IF DISCLOSURE OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS IS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO ITEM 2(d) OR 2(e)
 


¨



6



CITIZENSHIP OR PLACE OF ORGANIZATION

 
USA





NUMBER OF SHARES BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON WITH


7


SOLE VOTING POWER

 


6,426,435






8


SHARED VOTING POWER

 


- 0 -






9


SOLE DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


6,426,435






10


SHARED DISPOSITIVE POWER

 


- 0 -






11



AGGREGATE AMOUNT BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY EACH REPORTING PERSON



 
6,426,435







12


CHECK BOX IF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT IN ROW (11) EXCLUDES CERTAIN SHARES
 


o



13



PERCENT OF CLASS REPRESENTED BY AMOUNT IN ROW (11)



 
7.5%







14



TYPE OF REPORTING PERSON



 
IN











 


8





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108









The following constitutes Amendment No. 1 to the Schedule 13D filed by the undersigned (“Amendment No. 1”).  This Amendment No. 1 amends the Schedule 13D as specifically set forth herein.






Item 4.


Purpose of Transaction.



 
Item 4 is hereby amended to add the following:


On October 7, 2016, Brendan Springstubb, Senior Analyst of Engaged Capital, was appointed to the Issuer’s Board of Directors (the “Board”) to fill a vacancy on the Board following an incumbent director’s resignation.
 


 


9





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108


 

SIGNATURES
 
After reasonable inquiry and to the best of his knowledge and belief, the undersigned certifies that the information set forth in this statement is true, complete and correct.
 
Dated: October 12, 2016
 






  

Engaged Capital Flagship Master Fund, LP


  
  

  

By:


Engaged Capital, LLC
General Partner


  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Founder and Chief Investment Officer










  

Engaged Capital Co-Invest IV, LP


  
  

  

By:


Engaged Capital, LLC
General Partner


  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Founder and Chief Investment Officer










  

Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, LP


  
  
  

  

By:


Engaged Capital, LLC
General Partner


  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Founder and Chief Investment Officer










  

Engaged Capital Flagship Fund, Ltd.


  
  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Director



 


 


10





 
CUSIP NO. 8676EP108







  

Engaged Capital, LLC


  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Founder and Chief Investment Officer










  

Engaged Capital Holdings, LLC


  
  

  

By:


/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Name:


Glenn W. Welling


  
  

Title:


Sole Member










  

/s/ Glenn W. Welling


  

Glenn W. Welling



 




 


11





 















Elevate your investments
Try it for free


















Engaged Capital LLC Top Holdings 13F Filings




















































Home
Articles
Latest Filings
All Funds
Stocks Being Bought
Stocks Being Sold
Insider Buying







FREE registration required to continue...

                
                You have viewed 6 pages within the last 6 hours.  To continue, please register at Holdings Channel for unlimited
		page views and our free weekly newsletter, by entering your name and email address below.  Registration is absolutely free.
By registering, you agree to our privacy policy & terms of use.
                
		If you are in Canada, you must click here for alternate registration page.

                

                
                Problems with your registration ''sticking?''  Enable your browser to receive our ''cookie'' to resolve.
                Other questions? Email us at: info@holdingschannel.com


Engaged Capital LLC Top Holdings 13F Filings | www.HoldingsChannel.com | 
Copyright © 2013 - 2017, All Rights Reserved



Nothing in Holdings Channel is intended to be investment advice, nor does it represent the opinion of, counsel
from, or recommendations by BNK Invest Inc. or any of its affiliates, subsidiaries or partners.  
  None of the information contained herein constitutes a recommendation that any particular security, portfolio,
 transaction, or investment strategy is suitable for any specific person.  All viewers agree that under no
circumstances will BNK Invest, Inc,. its subsidiaries, partners, officers, employees, affiliates, or agents be held
liable for any loss or damage caused by your reliance on information obtained.  By visiting, using or viewing this site, you 
agree to the following 
Full Disclaimer & Terms of Use and 
Privacy Policy.  Video widget and market videos powered by Market News Video.  Quote and option data delayed at 
least 15 minutes; stock quote data powered by Ticker Technologies, and Mergent. Contact Holdings Channel; Meet Our Editorial Staff.
























ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC
                    

HTTP://WWW.ENGAGEDCAPITAL.COM
•   NEWPORT BEACH, CA
                          • Investment Advisor
                          • Hedge Fund
                          • Activist Investor
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Engaged Capital is based out of Newport Beach and is run by Glenn Welling. Engaged Capital is a hedge fund  with  1-10 clients and discretionary assets under management (AUM) of $374,291,505 (Form ADV from 2017-03-30).  Their last reported 13F filing for Q1 2017 included $394,173,000 in managed 13F securities
    and a top 10 holdings concentration of 95.16%. Engaged Capital's largest holding is Rent-A-Center Inc. (New) with shares held of 8,983,609.  Engaged Capital has met the qualifications for inclusion in our WhaleScore system.    WhaleWisdom has at least 18 13Fs and  64 13D/G filings in our database for Engaged Capital. 
                                           






Equal-WTWhaleScore
?


66
S&P 500WhaleScore
?



Manager WeightedWhaleScore
?















Summary
13F Holdings
Ind. Managers
Inv. Advisor Info
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
 WhaleScore History



                Download 13F Summary to Excel
              


                    Download 13F Summary to Excel
                  


   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel















03/31/2017
Top Buys




Name% Change


HAIN
        
        Hain Celestial Group
17.812%



RCII
        
        Rent-A-Center Inc. ...
11.771%



NATI
        
        National Instrument...
1.732%



AJRD
        
        Aerojet Rocketdyne ...
0.906%



SCOR
        
        comScore Inc
0.715%








03/31/2017
Top Sells





Name% Change


BHE
         
         Benchmark Electroni...
17.008%


PRXL
         
         PAREXEL Internation...
1.978%


TRS
         
         Trimas Corp. (New)
0.884%


IWM
         
         iShares Russell 200...
0.796%


WEB
         
         WEB.COM GROUP INC C...
0.327%







03/31/2017
13F Holdings Summary




Stock% Port


RCII
                                                  
                                                  Rent-A-Center Inc. (New)
20.2157%


HAIN
                                                  
                                                  Hain Celestial Group
17.8115%


TIVO
                                                  
                                                  Tivo Corp (formerly Rovi Corp)
12.011%


STKL
                                                  
                                                  SunOpta Inc.
11.9138%


MED
                                                  
                                                  Medifast Inc
8.8875%

See All Holdings






03/31/2017
13F Activity




Market Value
                        $394.173 Million

                        Prior Market Value
                        $306.734 Million
New Purchases4 stocks
Additional Purchases5 stocks
Sold out of2 stocks
Reduced holdings in5 stocks
Top 10 Holdings %95.16%
Turnover %
                        [1]:37.50%
Turnover Alt %
                    [2]:38.05%
Time Held Top20:4.63 quarters
Time Held Top10:5.50 quarters
Time Held All:4.75 quarters

[1]:
                  Turnover is calculated by taking the # of new holdings (initial purchases) + the # of positions sold out of (not just reduced) divided by the total # of holdings for the quarter.
                
[2]:
                  Alt Turnover is calculated by taking either the total MV of new purchases or
                   the MV of securities sold, whichever is less,
                   divided by the total MV of the fund.
                






03/31/2017
13F Sector Allocation Over Time











Fund Metrics

You are limited to the prior 8 quarters of 13F filings.
            Subscribe to WhaleWisdom to view all filing data
            for ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC






Portfolio Performance
                    Top 20 equal-weighted holdings. Last updated
                      on 2017-06-29 



Performance
                      for Q1 2017:
                    
5.5%


Performance Last 4 Quarters:
37.29%





Performance Metrics




Stdev (5-yrs):
Subscription required
BETA (5-yrs):
Subscription required
ALPHA (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Max Drawdown (all-years):
Subscription required
Annualized Perf (3-yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Batting Avg vs S&P. (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Sortino (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Stutzer (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Treynor (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Sterling (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Calmar (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Information Ratio (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Tracking Error (3 yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Stdev Down (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Winning Months %:
Subscription required


Losing Months %:
Subscription required
Best 12 Months:
Subscription required
Worst 12 Months:

                          Subscription required
                        


Efficiency Ratio (3-yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Sharpe:
Subscription required
Stdev Sectors:
Subscription required


Skewness (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Kurtosis (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Upside Potential (3-yrs):
Subscription required





















Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
Start with one of our predefined groups or create your own.
        View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.
      



Take a Tour

           Save Changes to Tracked Backtest
Saving......

GENERATE
      REPORT
At least
      one fund must be selected before running a backtest
    
{{InvalidConfiguration()}}


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  


Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.



GENERATE
      REPORT


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  




Filers Selected: {{groupinfo.group.description}} - {{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}
      (click to edit)


      {{criteria.whalescore.description}}
      (click to edit)


      Filers being chosen based on prior performance
    
Get started by using: 

WhaleWisdom Fund Groups
WhaleScore Filers

One of your custom groups
Choose Filers by Performance
Log in to use your saved groups
Create new custom group



WhaleWisdom Fund Groups


{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}





Use Heat Map Stocks







{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}






< Back

Select WhaleScore Filers:
WhaleScore filers are chosen based on scores calculated the previous quarter.


Pro Sub. Required

{{o.description}}






< Back

Select Filers by Prior Performance
Filers are selected each quarter based on their prior performance. You can restrict which
      filers are included by using the filters below.



          Pro subscription required to select filers by performance
        


How do you want funds chosen?




Maximum Filers to use each quarter

            

(your subscription allows up to {{Limit}} filers):
Maximum number of filers
              to use exceeed
Maximum filers must set to
              at least 1




Quarterly turnover %






% top 10 concentration






 # of Holdings in 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            
{{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[0]}} - {{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[1]}}


 Market Cap of Fund's 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            

                                                      {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[0])}} - {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[1])}}
                                                    


 Avg. Time Held Top 10 (quarterly)
from:
            
            to
            

                                                                {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[0]}} quarters - {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[1]}} quarters
                                                              





Matching filers from latest quarter:
{{FilerPerformanceMatches}}






< Back
{{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}




Backtest options
Optional Stock Filters
Optional Hedging/Advanced



< Back


How do you want stocks selected when rebalancing?  


{{s.description}}
          


5
10
20
30
40
50


 (Pro sub. required)



        "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
        and
        "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
        are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
      


(optional) Minimum # of funds holding stock

(optional) Minimum percent of portfolio for each fund


Custom Weight Per Fund (scale of 1 through 10)


{{filer.name}}





Reset Weight



Specify the number of holdings to use



          {{s.description}}
        

          ** Holdings greater than 20 require a Pro level subscription to use. **
        




How do you want available funds allocated among stocks?  








< Back



Restrict Stocks Selected by Stock Market Cap Size?


 {{cap.name}}
                              




Stock Exclusions
Do not include stocks whose price exceeds:

Do not include stocks whose price is less:

Do not include any of the following tickers:
                                                          (comma separated)






ETF Filter
 ETF Holdings Only

 Exclude ETFs


ADR Filter *Pro Only*
 Foreign ADR Only

 Exclude ADRs





Limit Stock Selection to Certain Sectors or Industries? Restrict stocks to those in the selected sector or industry







< Back




Hedging Strategies

Simple Short Exposure. This strategy effectively shorts the S&P 500 by
        buying shares in the S&P 500 Short ETF.
        Simple Hedging will assume that 100%
        of the backtest's invested principal is always in the backtest's long positions.

        For example, if you choose a 25% hedging rate, then for a $10,000 portfolio,
        you will be long $10,000 and have a $2,500 short on the S&P 500.
        The short position will adjust each rebalancing period to match 25% of the total portfolio.
        Any gains/losses from the short are added to the overall available capital for the long positions in the
        portfolio.
      

Moving Average Hedge.  With this strategy, your portfolio will be hedged
        by shorting the S&P 500 whenever your long portfolio's performance drops below the monthly moving average.
        So if you set a 25% hedge, 25% of your long portfolio will be sold and the funds reallocated to the short
        whenever the hedge is in effect.
        Once your long portfolio performance goes back over the moving average, the short hedge will be removed
        and the funds from the short will be reallocated to your long positions.
      

        When hedging strategies are being used, backtests can only go back as far as 2006.  This is the date
        the S&P 500 Short ETF first appeared.
      

        Pro subscription required to use hedging strategies
      
Hedging Strategy:

      

No Hedging

          Short-Exposure Hedge
        

          Moving Average Hedge
        

Moving Average Months:


Moving Average Target:
                   

Your backtested portfolio
S&P 500 TR Index
Russell 2K TR Index

the moving average that will determine when hedging is on or off

Hedging %:
      

25%
50%
75%
100%



Stock Sell Buffer

      You can optionally include a stock sell buffer in your backtesting model.
      It works by keeping a stock in your portfolio even when it would otherwise drop out
      during rebalancing as long as it remains within your sell buffer threshold.
      For example, you are backtesting with the top 20 stocks each quarter and set a sell buffer of 50.
      In the first quarter, AAPL is one of the top 20 stocks and is included in the portfolio.
      In quarter 2, AAPL drops down to number 25. Without the sell buffer, AAPL would drop out
      for that quarter, but since it is still within the sell buffer threshold of 50,
      it will remain in the portfolio.
      Your portfolio size remains the same. The stocks that would have fallen out stay in and the
      stocks that would otherwise have been added stay out. Using the sell buffer may
      help produce a lower turnover rate.
    

      Sell Buffer Size (must be greater than # of holdings in portfolio to work):
      
No sell buffer
10
25
35
50
100




Rebalancing Frequency

      By default backtester rebalances quarterly using new 13F filing data. You can
      adjust the rebalancing frequency using the dropdown below. Reasons for
      changing the frequency include lower turnover and possible tax advantages
      by keeping stocks at least one year before selling.
    


        Do not rebalance after each quarter

or rebalance:
        
Every quarter (default)
 Every other quarter
 Once a year




How many days after the end-of-quarter date before doing the backtest? (0 - 60) 

DAYS





      Or use day whenever the filing was submitted to the SEC
      (or the last filing when using a group of funds):
Starting Quarter

      By default backtester will test your strategy using all available dates going back to 2001 (for subscribers only).
      You can optionally adjust when the backtest actually starts.
    
Starting Quarter:
      
All Available Dates


  Ending Quarter:
      
All Available Dates






GENERATE
      REPORT





Backtest Results:



Download Backtest Data to Excel
Downloading.  Please wait.....


Start Tracking This Backtest
Saving......


                                    Stop tracking this backtest
                                  
Log in to start tracking this backtest



No report has been run






                                {{s.description}}
                              

Configure Moving Averages


As of 2017-07-27








Want to backtest using all available 13F history?
      As a non-subscriber you are limited to the past two years of filing data.
        Subscribe now and backtest using 13F holdings data as
        far back as 2001.
      








 
YTD
1Y
2Y
3Y
5Y
7Y
10Y
Total Return
Annualized
Std Dev
Sortino



Whale(s)
Unhedged Portfolio

{{starting_record.yearly_entries[starting_record.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,10)| number:2}}%
{{starting_record.performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{starting_record.sortino|number}}


Hedged Portfolio
{{hedged_matrix.yearly_entries[hedged_matrix.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,10)| number:2}}%
{{hedged_matrix.performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.sortino|number}}


{{chart.comparison_index.description}}
{{chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries[chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,10)| number:2}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.sortino|number}}









                          Current Holdings Rebalanced on {{results.ending_period.start_date}}
                          Click the "Download Backtest Data to Excel" link above to see all stock activity


                          Stock prices used are the "total returns" stock price and will include
                          dividends, spinoffs, splits, and other adjustments.  Because of this, stock
                          prices shown here will likely not
                          match a stock's actual closing stock price on the same date.
                        





Stock Name
% of Portfolio
Avg Price Per Share(total returns price)
Total Returnas of 2017-07-27
Original Purchase Date



            								                  {{transaction.ticker}}
            								               {{transaction.stock_name}}

Sold All
{{transaction.percent_of_portfolio*100.0|number:2}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}


                                ${{starting_record.hedging_gain|number:2}}
                              

                                {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                            

{{transaction.original_purchase_date}}


{{results.ending_period.hedge.stock_name}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                              {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(results.ending_period.hedge)|number:2}}%
                            

                              {{results.ending_period.hedge.original_purchase_date}}
                            


*** Currently using {{ending_hedged_transaction.stock_name}} ***

{{ending_hedged_transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                                                        {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(ending_hedged_transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                      

                                                        {{ending_hedged_transaction.original_purchase_date}}
                                                      









Ending Sector Allocation

















































Quarter to view:

Current Combined 13F/13D/G
Q1 2017 13F Filings 
Q4 2016 13F Filings 
Q3 2016 13F Filings 
Q2 2016 13F Filings 
Q1 2016 13F Filings 
Q4 2015 13F Filings 
Q3 2015 13F Filings 
Q2 2015 13F Filings 
Q1 2015 13F Filings subscription required
Q4 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q3 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q2 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q1 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q4 2013 13F Filings subscription required



                      Refresh
                    
 Advanced Export
Download CSV
Download Excel (.xlsx)
Download TSV







                               Click to See Additional Filters
                              



Security Types:




                  Shares


                  Calls


                  Puts


                  Principal

Changes in Holdings:

 New Position
Added to Position
Reduced Position
Closed Out Position
No Change



Ranking is in the top:



Minimum # of shares:



Stock ticker: 



Is ETF?
YesNo



                                      Refresh
                                    








Edit Columns


*Shares are split adjusted
		






×
Report an error






Your name (optional):


Your email (optional):


Error to report or any other comments(required):













                









Cancel





 Click here to report any possible errors with this listing.





13F Filings Available:



                            2017-03-31 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2017-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-06-30 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-03-31 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2013-12-31 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2013-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          






×
CSV Export Module



      This will schedule a job to export all requested 13f holdings data for this filer.
      When completed, an email will be sent to the email address you specify
      containing a link to download the .zip file of the CSV file(s) you requested.
    



Output Type


             Output all 13f holdings into a single CSV file
             

              Output all 13f holdings into separate CSV files per quarter
              



Columns to include


Filer Name
Stock Name
Stock Ticker
Quarter Date
Type of Security
Current Shares Held
Current Market Value
Previous Shares Held
Previous Market Value
Current % of Portfolio
Previous % of Portfolio
Current Rank
Previous Rank
Change in Shares
Type of Change
Sector




13F Quarters to include


2017-03-31
2016-12-31
2016-09-30
2016-06-30
2016-03-31
2015-12-31
2015-09-30
2015-06-30




Email Address to send data to








Cancel
Schedule Export







  This lets you look at individual sub managers or subsidiaries within
  the 13F filing.




Quarter:
03/31/2017
12/31/2016
09/30/2016
06/30/2016
03/31/2016
12/31/2015
09/30/2015
06/30/2015
Manager:






Optionally compare to:



Quarter 2:
03/31/2017
12/31/2016
09/30/2016
06/30/2016
03/31/2016
12/31/2015
09/30/2015
06/30/2015
Manager 2:













Number of shares is NOT split-adjusted



View Last Form Adv Compilation Report on Record

ENGAGED CAPITAL

Classified as Hedge Fund

610 NEWPORT CENTER DRIVE
SUITE 250

NEWPORT BEACH
CA
            
        92660
Country: United States


          Business Phone:
          949-734-7900
Fax:
              949-734-7901


Professional Investment Advisor Data

SEC Registration as :

Large Advisory Firm
      


Form of Organization:
Limited Liability Company 


Organized in:
DE


Number of employees:
10


Other Business Activities:
commodity pool operator or commodity trading advisor 


Advisor Fees/Compensation:
Percentage of assets under management,Performance-based fees



        Amount of client funds and securities:
      
327,157,000



            Total Number of Clients:
          
5



            Amount of client funds and securities by related persons:
          




                Total Number of clients from related persons:
              



Disclosures:




HTTP://WWW.ENGAGEDCAPITAL.COM


    Data above was derived from SEC filings.
  



Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...




WhaleScore history for ENGAGED CAPITAL LLC
You must have a subscription to view WhaleScore histories








Elevate your investments
Try it for free

























